 1795. 7th month.
 29th We set forward this Morning a little refreshed, and rode near
40 Miles through a Mountainous Country; the people seem to live well, and
appear open-hearted to receive friends, many being weary of their Teachers.
As I was very weak in body, we hired a Chair to ease me in travelling, &
reached to our friend Samuel Moor 's the 30th. being about 40 miles; my wea-
ry body and mind seemed to experience much Comfort. we had two meetings 8th. mo. 3rd. We had two meetings here, one of which was held in S.M. 's House, large
and satisfactory; and the other on a mountain not far off: I marvelled at
the kindness of the People, and their openness to receive:
 we set
forward for Annapolis, and that afternoon had a Meeting at Randolph,
and though very rainy, it was large and very satisfactory. The next day
had a Meeting in a Baptist Meeting-house near; and another about ten
miles off; both were favoured seasons, and the people openhearted & kind. 6th. This day we reached to Annapolis, & from thence went to Edward ~~
Thorn's, who kindly took us in his Boat to Digby about nine Miles.
This is a small Town of about 100 houses, standing on the Bason so called, at
the Mouth of Annapolis river, where that empties through a narrow pas-
sage into the Bay of Fundy. Here the tide, it is said, riseth 30 feet. 7th. A large room in the Tavern where we lodged, was freely offered to
hold Meetings in; Which was this day occupied, and a large Meeting held
there to good satisfaction, to the tendering of some hearts. -- We
were requested to stay longer, & to have more Meetings; but intending to cross 
 1795. 8th month. 
the Bay that in a Vessel which was to sail that afternoon for
 New-Brunswick; we thought it best to take leave of them, and go
on board. We were on the water all night, which was to me very
trying, as the motion of the vessel caused me to be very sick. In about 22
hours we landed: it is called about forty Miles from Digby to this 
 place. 8th. One who was called a Bishop of the Church of England, was
with us on board of this Vessel. The man was respectful, and desired to
see my Certificate; on it's being shewn to him, he commended it, and the
Order settled among friends; saying, It well agreed with his Sentiments.
After this his kindness towards me increased; for he came frequently
to enquire how I was; saying, "Friend Evans, are you any better: And
when we parted, he gave me his blessing, as also divers others did, in their 
way 9th. At New Brunswick we had two large and fa
voured Meetings, to the tendering of many hearts, and bringing as I thought honour
to the Cause of Truth; many expressed their Satisfaction, and I admi
red their solid sitting, as there was long silence, and a number of them
never before at any of our meetings. It was the Lord's mercy; Blessed be
his great Name; I am but as a worm, and no man. ---- Many of the People hereaway, have had an education amongst
Friends, and are friendly; But appear to be as Sheep without a Shepherd
I felt Love flowing towards them; and I thought great openness appear'd in
 this town towards the Doctrine of Truth: a number expressing their tenderness
 
by the flowing of their Tears. 10th. On the other side of this Bay
of Fundy, there was not anything oppressed my mind with more sadness
than the manner, the former French inhabitants of the Place, which were called
Neutrals, were forced away from their improved Farms and Estates in this
Part of Nova Scotia, by those acting under British Authority, and Brit-
tish Subjects coming in to inherit the fruits of their Labor. I mention'd my Sentiments
 freely concerning such injustice taking place, & I am willing to leave it. 10th. As we had to wait for a passage from hence to Bever Harbour, visit-
ed a few families here, being kindly received by the people where we came. 11th. This Morning, we went on board of a Boat with four Oars, and came about
20 Miles to Dipper-harbour; here we lodged at one Frenches, who to enter-
tained us kindly & refused taking pay for it: Being yet only about half
Way to Bever-Harbour, we went on board early next morning, and
 coming thither, had a meeting in that place in the afternoon, which was a
 solid season; Likewise the next day we had another meeting, also solid. 14th. We proceeded then about 20 Miles to Passomaquady, at the mouth
of the river Saint Croix; and from thence the next day also by Water to
 Machias in the province of Main: Here, altho' no member of our Society
 resided in the place, we had two large and satisfactory Meetings. They
 people desired us to stay longer, and have more: But I have found it safest
to leave the People hungring, rather than to stay to make additions: I wish
all who travel on Truth's account to guard against the Activity of the
Creature, lest a good savour be not left among Strangers. Being 1795. 8th month.
 17th. Being kindly supplied with Horses, & a man to
take them back, we went on to Pleasant-River, about 20 Miles towards
 Penobscot: As heretofore hinted there appears to be much Openness
amongst the inhabitants of this Eastern Country towards Friends: I thought
it looked as tho' "the fields were white unto Harvest;" and that many seem
ed weary of their Teachers: We had a Small solid meeting here the
next day: After which we crossed the River to Richard Coffin 's. 19th. Hiring Horses and a Man to take them back, we came about
30 Miles to French-man's Bay, and the next day we reached to the house
of Paul Dudley , who was a very kind man: He offered his Boat and
Hands to take us near 30 Miles, but It being rainy we tarried here till
the day following, day and then were taken down Frenchman's
Bay to the Blue Hills: 21st. On the Way to Penobscot we had
a pleasant Passage; and I had to admire the goodness of the Lord,
in opening & preparing my Way. Blessed be his excellent Name, doth
my soul say, tremblingly, in awful fear and Love. -- The next day
we hired Horses to cross a neck of Land about six Miles; and then went
by water to Penobscot: Feeling Poor in mind, and hearing of an Opportu-
nity to go on further by Water, We had like to have gone, But perceiv
ing an Opening unexpectedly for a meeting here next day, we concluded to
tarry, having one in the Morning, and also another in the afternoon, so
lid and profitable, I hope: The people's behaviour was commendable, I was
comforted, and some benefit perhaps was received by individuals among them. 8th month.
 24th. After leaving Penobscot we crossed the bay about 14 Miles to
 Ducktrap, and had a small solid meeting among the People there
that afternoon; they people behaved well; The next day we hired
a man and horses to take us to Camden on Penobscot bay; and on
the day following had a smallish meeting there, which I thought
was favour'd. Here I bought a Horse, bridle and saddle, and rode
to Broad Bay; where we had a satisfactory meeting at the widow
 Chapman 's House; in which deep impressions were made on some
Minds, and we were brought near to each other, altho' outwardly
Strangers. 27th. In the afternoon we proceeded about 15 miles
 to the Widow Kennedy 's, near Sheepsgut Ferry; and on the day follow-
 ing reached to our friend Jeremiah Hacker 's at Durham; 29th From hence, pro-
ceeding to Falmouth, in company of several friends, on first day were at
meeting there, which was, as I thought, poor and dull: The weather was warm
and riding thus on horseback was trying to my shattered condition: Yet I
am favoured: All praise belongs to the Lord: I have been fully convinced
in this my pilgrim-like-Journey for the good of Souls, that nothing
belongs to man, nor the contrivence of Men in putting forward the Lord's
 Work. 31st 
9th mo 2nd From Falmouth we came to Sandwich, where we had two
 meetings, one of which was publick; The other with our friends
selected: These were exercising, but I believe they ended well. Hard labour
and much Poverty seem to be my allotment: But let me not murmur
 
 murmur; The Lord has hitherto helped me. 3rd. From hence we are to journey to Cohorse, in Vermont. . At which 
place we arrived on the 4th. I was much weary. We had two Meetings the day
following, being first day; One of them was held in a School-house
in a good degree solid; the other in a Baptist Meeting house, large, but
interrupted by the people's going out and in: It is often so, when we consent
to hold meetings in the houses which belong to People of other Societies.
I believe we ought carefully to feel our way, even when their houses are offered
freely. Here I met with my friend Henry Hull from Nine Partners. 7th. I had a Meeting in Sharon near Bassett's, which was large; but it
suffered Loss by a friend's speaking rather too much about his own
Convincement: My Mind was distressed hereby; And my desires are that
Friends of the Ministry may be well guarded against branching out
improperly, when silence might be more useful near a Meeting's Conclusion. We now set out for Danby, through a Mountainous Country, which
9th. we reached the next day. My journey since I left my habitation, I
think amounts to near two thousand Miles by land and Water till
came to this place; And I am thankful that I feel in good measure
Comfortable after the Fatigue which has attended such a long Travel. 10th. At Danby we had a meeting that was large, and exercising. I thought
the people's minds were too much outward, and not attentive to the true founda-
tion. The next day had a favoured meeting at Mountholly on the green
mountain in Vermont, where no Meeting of Friends was ever held
 held before: The people sat commendably: several of them
invited us to their houses; But believing myself clear, I chose ra-
ther to leave them in the hand of the Lord. 12th. Next at Walling's
 valley, a little village, we had a large & good meeting; where there
had not been any held by friends before: A Baptist Minister
was present, who seemed to be tendered. --- The height of the
mountains here seemed awful, exceeding any that I had seen:
Some people suppose that much more rain and snow fall on them
 then doth in a level country. --- Oh! the sympathy I have
perceived for those who dwell in these rough places; many of them
in poor cottages, covered with Bark, or straw. 13th. I was at Danby meeting again, it being the first of the
week, and seemed to be a dull season; yet some ability to la-
bour amongst them was afforded; several things opened in my mind
concerning the free use of distilled Spirits, India Tea, and tobacco,
and I had to tell the people I was apprehensive these things were
not introduced amongst us by the dictates of Truth; but that they
rather came in by stealth, as a thief in the night, and stand behind
the curtain of custom (as many other evils do; causing weak-
ness among us as a people: Yet that I believed the Lord's refining work
would go forward, & prevail over all Opposition, but gradually; And that
 and that a reformation is begun; Therefore let not the little
ones be discouraged; For though the first who step forth to change
evil customs may meet with exercise and sore conflicts, yet
as they stand simple, & keep humbly resigned to the Lord's disposal,
their reward will be sure. 14th. Leaving Danby I came
 to Easton; and on the 16th, crossed the North River to the Week
day meeting at Saratoga; which was a trying season. The day following I went back to their monthly mo.ly meeting
at Easton; at the close whereof the Shutters were opened at my re-
quest, and I was exercised in close labour with Friends of both sexes
on the subject of a reformation, having to touch on the particular
things which, as above, were mentioned at Danby: Also on the harm
 arising extensive Trade, (with that of declining to use our own coun-
 try produce:) advising that children be brought up to industry: &c. 18th. Travelling to White-Creek, the following day, I had a large and
solid meeting there; after which an aged man came to me, and
said, he had thought much of being a Quaker, yet had been afraid
to join them, but this day the Truth had been declared to his com-
fort: and at parting he expressed his wish that the Lord might prosper the
work in my hand. 20th. The following first day I was at Pitts-town Meeting;
the first which was held in their new Meeting house, being a large
gathering; I believe the Truth was in Dominion among us; and it see-
med marvellous to see such a mixed multitude sit so still & solid. 23d
 The next Meeting was among friends of Queman's Patent, large and
solid. At the close of the publick sitting, I had an opportunity with
friends by themselves; Here way opened for close labour respecting the
the necessity of reformation, as things amongst them were much out of
Order, and too much lukewarmness prevalent. I was also at their
monthly meeting next day, where I was engaged to labour with
both Sexes, on the necessity of reformation, and had to touch on the
same Subjects as in other Places, concerning Foreign Trade, Rum, India
 Tea, Tobacco &c, exhorting to that of more true moderation, temperance
&c, with the use of our own country Produce. 26th. After that I had a Meeting at Clineykill, a solid favoured
Season, said to be the largest known to be in that place: A hope
was expressed by some that the Lord would bless my Labours. 27th. The next day was at New-Britain, a large and solid Meeting; and
another at Steven-town in the Afternoon, where power was given
to labour fervently for the good of souls --- I am this day 64
years old; and am at times deeply humbled in beholding how my
way has been opened, and every kindness necessary have I witnessed from all
sorts of people; with a Capacity to undergo hard-travelling, thru' scenes
& Places where to human view it seemed impossible: In the Arm
of the Lord is all Strength & sufficiency. 28th This Morning I visited a Settlement of the People called Sha-
kers, who seem'd to receive me kindly, yet were much reser-
ved. I informed them I had felt my mind drawn to visit them
in love, and if they were free to sit down with us, if anything
arose in any of our minds, we might speak freely; adding also
that I had often heard of them, but did not see any of their sort
before now: One of them then said, he expected some things report
ed of them might be true, and some false: He then leaving us, (I
suppose he went to consult with his Brethren,) but soon return-
ing, he asked if I was born in this Country, and of what pro-
 fession I was? I told him I was one of the People called Quakers;
and shew'd my certificate; After he read it, he asked if he might
shew it to some in the next room; which I allowed him do:
He then went in again, where, by that time, I suppose many were
collected in Council; I heard them read over my certificate, which
after some time was brought back, and I was told they found I was an
approved Minister of that Society & was on a long journey; I informed
him I was on my return; and if he had freedom I should be willing
to know something of their Principles: He then informed me, They
believed in Christ Jesus, and in his second appearance, and endea
vored to live up to the Scriptures, and to follow Christ: being Members
of his Church thro' the baptism of the holy Ghost: and coming under the
 the cross: This, he said, had crucified every fleshly lust, and given
 them power to resist the tempter: That also, they held that it was not right to
marry, but that the World was wrong, and laid in Sin, &c. He seem'd
confident in supposing their Tenets to be right in respect to marriage, and that they take up
the cross to lustful desires, and go beyond others in self-mortification, &c.
With respect to their Worship, he informed me they came together
every evening, took a solid pause, and if the Elders feel any thing to
arise with weight, they were permitted to speak; they also sing the Songs
of Solomon, use dancing &c. I informed him of our belief concer-
ning the benefit of Silence, and of Spiritual Worship; and advised him
to beware of being over confident in supposing they had witnessed grea-
ter Attainments than others. He told me they believed George Fox to
have been a good Man, until he mixed with the World; that then he fell
away, and there had been a falling away among us till this time; and we
had lost our gift of discerning, & had in our Church many rotten, or defected Members,
But they (the Shakers) he said, had that Gift, & had sought out some of
the most deep & hidden Sins, &c: -- I let him know I feared they were
mistaken, not being so whole as they thought themselves to be. --- This man
appear'd to be sober & well-behaved. He said they all lived in Love, and in
one family, and portion'd out each one's labour, according to their ability:
 They have many Mechanicks, and some are appointed to inspect the work
 before it is Sold; appearing to maintain Credit by honest dealing, &c. -
They seem appear to be much United, do not act without consulting together, and -
move as in a body, This Man told me farther, they did not receive any as Mem-
bers if they had wronged any person, until they had returned fourfold: and when
any one joined them, his Property is put into public Stock; & if he should leave 
 leave them, he is to take out what he first put in, & no more. They ap
pear to be a decent industrious people; and on the whole, I thought better
of them, than before I went to see them. I understand the women among these People, were much by themselves;
They spin, knit, sew, weave, and manage the Houshold Affairs. 29th. Moving forward to East Husack, I was at a very large Meeting there;
This was almost held in silence, yet the people sat quiet and solid: I
told them I much commended that, and wished them not to be discouraged;
also that, as God was a Spirit, we believed he might be worshipped in
Spirit and in Truth, even where no vocal Sound or Voice is to be heard.
It being a Season of mortality here, I visited several sick persons and
Families, of which our valued friend Robert Nisbet 's was one, who
deceased soon after: many others also were called off here about that time. 10th. Mo. 1st. The monthly Meeting at East Husack being held now, I attended
it, being a large gathering & a favoured season in the fore part: I sat
with Women friends while they answered the queries: where a deep search was
made into the State of Things, to my comfort: I then sat with the Men in
the like Exercise: But life seem'd to be wanting: I thought there was a dis
position to answer evasively, and unless they were more weighty in the
business, The queries might become a snare to them. 2nd. At one place I confess I was grieved, at seeing so large preparations for
making Cyder: doth it not tend to promote Excess in drinking? The next
day had a small dull meeting at a friend's house; and to me, mournful. Then
went on our Way towards Tyringham. We 3rd. We visited another settlement of those called Shakers: after a
solid conferrence we were permitted to see the women, who appeared
plain and sober; one of them, and antient Woman, spake in a free
and friendly way, asking several questions: She seemed well satisfied
with my answers, and invited me to come again. Their Head-dress was
much the uniform: and although I had some satisfaction in the visit, I feared
they were too much unacquainted with the Cross of Christ; yet they
speak of living under the cross. 4th. Had a large and satisfactory Meeting at Tyringham; after which
I was in Conferrence with a Committee from East Husack Mo.ly Meeting,
in respect to holding a meeting at this place, as the number is small,
and the State of things but low. 6th The next day travelled on
a rough road through a mountainous Country to Charles Richards's 
House at Goshen; and the next day following a large and solid Meeting was
 held there: It may be remarked the people in those parts are long in ga-
thering to assemblies for Worship. C. Richards seems to be a singu-
 lar man in almost all his conduct; and yet in the main, I esteemed
him honest-hearted. Branch The day following in the afternoon, we
had a dull heavy Meeting at a place called the Branch, and the 8th.
 had one at New-milford; which was low in the forepart; untill some
 gay people not of our perswasion came in; unto whom I believe
the Lord had regard, for ability was received to extend gospel labour
for their benefit: as a lukewarm drowsy spirit was to be felt 
before
 before they came in. This was the preparative Meeting day
at New-Milford, But matters appeared to be in a low State. --
At the close of the first Meeting, I felt a desire to have a
meeting with the inhabitants of New-Milford next day, which
was united with on being mention'd, and the time and place proposed;
and those gay people above hinted proposed to spread the notice. 9th. Agreeable to which proposal, a pretty large number assembled of
those not of our society in a private house near the town, which was 
a favoured season, not soon to be forgotten. 10th. Going Forward, I
had a pretty large and satisfactory Meeting at Friends Meeting-
house in the Valley, so called: And next day at Peach Pond, was at a
small meeting, where poverty was felt; yet I had some labour. 12th. Next I attended the Monthly Meeting at Oblong, which was an
exercising time; I fear'd barrenness prevailed; the crowding Cares of
the World & the deceitfulness of Riches choaking the good seed: I had 
some close labor which appeared to be well taken; The day follow-
ing I attended the select Meeting at the same place, which was dull &
exercising: 14th. From hence I went to Nine Partners to their monthly
 Meeting; which was very large, and somewhat lively, I thought; I per-
ceived some ability to labour satisfactorily. ~~ Next day I met
with a Committee on the Subject of a Boarding School at the same
place: I thought I was led to see more clearly than ever before, into 
the 
 the nature or right manner of educating Children, which I men-
 tioned, and left with them. 16th. Next I attended the Creek Monthly Meeting: which, I thought was an exercising poor-time.
The day following I had a large Meeting, which was at my desire
appointed for the young people at the Creek Meeting-house; This
was a season of Divine Favour: The Youth felt more pleasant to me
separated from others; I fear the unlawful love of lawless things is
a great Snare, in which the Enemy hath caught many, who have appear'd
to be well-disposed Members of our Society, up and down in this land. 18th. Had a Meeting at Little nine Partners, so large that the house could
not contain all the people; It was exercising, yet blessed be the God
of all power; he gave ability to labor in his cause, to the tendering of
some hearts. Returning to Nine Partners, I was at a Meeting 
appointed for the Youth, at my desire: which was a solid favoured time:
some of these appeared to be of the naughty rebellious Ones: Oh! may
the opportunity be as bread cast upon the Waters' to be found hereafter. 20th. I had also at the same place a large and solid Meeting with
the Parents and Heads of Families of the Monthly Meeting; I had to
revive among them the Sense of our Primitive friends, respecting fine
houses, Rich furniture, a Worldly spirit, &c, also my sentiments concern-
ing the free use of Tobacco, & other things heretofore mention'd, which 
 which (as it seems to me) have stole in upon us as a thief in the night,
and which in a measure occasion dimness and weakness with respect to
a faithful Support of the pure testimony of Truth. 21st. And the next day at the Creek, or stone, house, a meeting of the same
kind was held with heads of families, large, and owned by the Truth, as many
Friends expressed; for many hearts were tendered, & many tears dropt.
Here also the example & Care of our Predecessors, for punctuality in
dealings, true moderation in living &c, was brought into view; and a weigh-
ty Care urged in the education of Children: also the ruinous Effects of a
neglect of that Care was mention'd. The day following I had
a large & solid Meeting at Stephen Dean 's house; And one at
 Israel Titus 's house in the afternoon, which was likewise satisfactory. 23rd. At Swago also I had a pretty large Meeting, which was thought
 to be favoured. --- On my way the next day to Appoquage, I saw a
shameful sight, a Bull tied up, and dogs allowed to worrey him in that
condition: and those looking on, who (no' doubt) professed Christianity. 25th. Attending Appoquage meeting on first day, it was so large
the house was too small for the people: but too many of them see-
med to be a bad sort, yet they sat commendably for such a mixed num-
ber; and I was concerned to lay things close, & scarcely got relieved in the
meeting: In the afternoon I had but little strength to hold up my head,
believing this is a poor place, & the faithful number but few. I went from hence to Oblong again; thro' a rough mountainous Country.
A friend who was educated in the Presbyterian profession informed me 
that 
 that he was convinced of the truth, on hearing some little Children
 using the plain language of thee, to one another; and they appearing
so lamblike, he believed it was Truth's language: I thought, from
this instance, how much effect simple Plainness hath, even when observ-
able in children: and how much more if grown people & Parents were
properly concerned to live up the pure inward principle of Truth? We
should then be teachers, instead of stumbling blocks, to honest enqui-
rers; and like the Salt of the earth, the savour whereof would be perceived
for miles round, in a neighborhood where it was retained. 28th. I attended the Quarterly Meeting at Oblong; it was very large,
and comfortable to my mind: Gospel Truths were declared to the tendering
of many hearts: The next day the Youth's Meeting was said to be the
largest known in this place; a solid and favour'd season I believe; The
people sat quiet, although crowded; and I sat in silence, being comforted
in Christ our Lord. The day following I travelled
towards Nine partners again, their Qu.ly Meeting being near, and on the way Stopped at the Ridge Meeting
held the 1st of the 11th month, which was very large, solemnity prevailing,
tho' many had to stand up for want of seats. The day before I staid at a
Friend's house, whose wife was in a weak State of health: she appeared to be
of an innocent spirit, and expected much satisfaction in the right. 2nd. This morning considering how well I fared among my friends, I feared the
danger of forgetting the Lord, who had so remarkably favour'd, & prepared my
way; Let him have the praise of his own Works, who is alone worthy, forever. I had a solid opportunity with a naughty young man, the only 
Son 
 Son of his father; I intreated him to forsake evil company, and
in so doing he would be likely to find Comfort, otherwise he would not, either
 here or hereafter: using much freedom with him, as one who resembled the
 prodigal Son the parable, he appear'd to take it well, and said, he hoped he
should not forget my advice. 3rd. Being at the select Quarterly meeting at Nine Partners, I was led to
mention my sense of there being no necessity for much school learning
for a gospel minister; that the knowledge of Latin, Greek, & Hebrew, is more likely
 to hinder, then to help a gospel Minister: Truth being a simple Thing, not
 needing learned languages to explain it &c. The Quar.ly meeting
for business the next day was very large; and I thought, was favoured with
 power from on high to labour for the good cause in a way that is uncommon.
I felt my mind impressed with concern to sit with both men friends and the
women, first in one Meeting, & then in the other, whilst the Business of reading
the Queries & the Answers to them is attended to: Which being mentiond, my re-
quest was united with by both men and women friends: It was a season of fa-
vour, as I had an opportunity in both Meetings to clear myself respecting
the trust which I apprehended the Lord reposed in me, to the Satisfaction of my self
and my friends: And many hearts were tendered, & minds instructed and edi-
fied; which divers freely and openly expressed: So that we parted in near
Love, a sense of which I hope will not soon be forgotten: Let the Name of
the Lord be blessed. The day following was a publick Meeting at the
same place, larger than their large Meeting-house could contain; in
which a good degree of solidity prevailed. Yet I thought the Meeting was hurt 
 hurt by too much preaching: It is necessary a deep travail of
spirit, should take place for the arising of that Spirit and life
which gives victory over lightness and airy dispositions; without which
preaching is vain. 6th. Inclining now to go towards Hartford in Con-
necticut, I travelled about 20 miles, and in the afternoon had a Meeting
near Goshen in a Baptist Meeting-house; it was remarked that the
meeting was solid & quiet. 8th. Coming to East Hartford where a number dwell
 who by convincement have of late been joined to our Society, I attended
their Meeting on first day forenoon; Also in the afternoon when notice was
further spread, we had a large and favoured Meeting: but it was somewhat
injured by the publick appearance of one towards whom
Care was extended. In the evening also we had the largest meeting ever seen at this
place; and tho' the crouding of the people was some hindrance to its'
Settlement in quietude, yet the seasoning virtue of Truth was perceived
by many: insomuch, that near a hundred persons, after the Meeting
concluded, were loth to depart from the house; I felt my mind engaged in
exercise on their account; but went to lay down, that I might rest a little;
After they had conferred together, a solid young man came, and told me
they desired another oppertunity, as the evening meeting was so crouded. This
proved to be a time of much favour: to shew them that I was no Impostor
I caused my Certificate to be read near the close: This lasted till near
midnight: such a solemnity prevailed, that it seemed not easy to separate.
I did believe the Truth came into dominion this evening: May the Lord be
 praised who is alone worthy, saith my Soul. 9th. Feeling a draught in my mind to go and visit a Clergyman named Perkins in West Hartford who
had shewn some bitterness towards friends; and although some thought
it was likely he would treat me with contempt, I was most easy to go,
being accompanied by two friends: when we went to him, he treated us
friendly beyond our expectation, saying he had attended at one one Mee-
ting, and was well satisfied with what I said: I replied, if thou wouldest
lay aside forms and ceremonies, I think we shall be likely to agree in
the parts which are essential: he then said, he believed the Scriptures to
be the only rule of faith and practice, and that revelation had ceased. I en-
deavoured to open my Sentiments to him in freedom, That the Scriptures
appeared to be a sealed book, and the true meaning of many parts not to be ob-
tained, except thro' the assistance of the same Spirit which gave them forth,
That the divine principle of Light and Grace which we preach up, and
testify unto, is that, which if attended to, brings to the knowledge of
God; That the Spirit of Wisdom which inspired the Penmen who
wrote the Scriptures, is surely to be preferred before that which was
written under its' Influence, &c, altho' he said he believed in free grace
yet he continued to urge the Scriptures being the only Rule, other Con-
versation followed, yet it appeared he was loth to yield to any Sen-
timent different from what he had been accustomed to endeavour to
uphold, according to their Creed: I let him know before we parted, that I
thought he knew better than he spake. 10th. The next day I had a Meeting with Friends of Hartford by them- 
 themselves, to my comfort and their theirs. I saw there was great need
of care in this place, as they are but newly convinced, and their number-
small. They hold Meetings under the Care of Oblong monthly meeting
in the government of New York. This viz. Hartford appears to have been a dark place
of formal Professors of Religion. 12th. Leaving Hartford, and returning
westward bout 40 miles, I had a solid & satisfactory meeting at Goshen:
where some attended that never had been at one of our Meetings before:
with one of whom I had solid conversation: She was in a tender State,
& expressed herself not satisfied with their hireling Teachers, believing they
ought to work for something towards their own maintenance; without spend-
ing their time from week to week in an idle way, &c:. 14th. I went from hence to see a Settlement of Indians at Scatecook, about
30 in number, with whom I had a meeting: and afterwards visited them
in their families, in which I had satisfaction. The next day I was at
that called the Branch Meeting, being on first day, which was dull and exer-
 16th. cising. ---- At the Monthly Meeting at Oblong I also attended, and
 had a solid season both among men and women; many of the young peo-
People were present, to whom, as well as to Parents & others I endeavored to discharge my
self honestly: reminding them of the Indians above mention'd, for whom I was
 concerned, as much of the land had been obtained from that People
under value, & some of it very unfairly, That now it was right, kindness
 towards them should be remembred; Friends uniting with my Concern, a Commit-
tee was appointed to visit the Indians, & administer to their help if need-
ful. This days exercise & Labour yielded me Comfort, and, I believe tended to
the Glory of God; Blessed be his great Name; He is the Helper of his People. 17th. Travelling homewards about 30 miles, I had in the Evening at a
Friends house some edifying conversation: I fear it is too often other-
wise, and that the Cause of Truth is at times hurt, and perhaps honest enqui-
rers stumbled, and friends weakened, when they come together, by light
conversation on worldly, or trifling Subjects. Had a Meeting at
Rob.t Randel 's house, which was thought to be solid and comforting,
as well as pretty large. 19th. Next at Ammawock, had a large Meeting in
the forenoon, which was exercising: and in the afternoon another at Cole-
bark; This was a comfortable heart-tendering season, wherein many eyes
dropped tears. Blessed be the Name of the Lord, who helpeth. 20th. I likewise had pretty large Meeting in the forenoon at Shappaqua
where Life was not permitted to rise high; And another in the after-
noon at Isaiah Quimby 's, which was more Satisfactory. 22nd. Coming on to New-York, I was on first day, fore, and afternoon
at Meeting with my friends there, which I thought were the most
afflicting Meetings I had sat in for some time: It was near the close
of a season of Mortality wherewith that city had been visited; which
should have produced humility, turning peoples' minds from the pursuit of
earthly riches, to that treasure which is durable: But to my grief, I was
afraid the inhabitants (when the late rod was withdrawn) too many were
turning, like the Sow, to that of wallowing in the mire again. 23d. Next day I visited a few families in the City, and had close conversation
with 
 a Formalist, whose Eyes, I thought were blinded by the God of this
 world. I told him in Substance, nearly on this Wise, that it grieved me to think, that while a remnent were
 trying to prevail with Young people & others to come into the Practice of
more plainness and true moderation consistent with the simplicity of our
Profession, those in high Station for worldly interest, should be keeping,
and holding up Articles & Things for Sale as a temptation to others to
branch out in purchasing, to deck themselves with Superfluities, &c. 26th. In about three days after this time I reached to my own habita-
tion again after a journey which took up near eight Months: and
in which I had to travel about 4,000 Miles; and have now cause
to praise & magnify the Name of the Lord, who in a marvellous man-
ner prepar'ed my way, & carried me through; and now vouchsafeth
the Sense of a reward which is sufficient for all my Trials & Labours;
That of finding my Wife & near Connections alive & in pretty
good health was esteemed by me an additional Cause for
 humble thanksgiving. 12th. mo. 5th. At our select Quarterly Meeting, my mind was closely exer-
cised concerning superfluities that appear; and particularly
I had to mention large Looking-glasses; whether having them
in friends houses was not one cause of keeping pride alive in the
hearts of those who spend time in standing before them to view their
dress, and to have all appear delicate & nice; and whether such scrupulous 
 nicety in t trigging of the body, doth not add to the Soul's un-
fitness to approach the presence of a heartsearching God, when
we go to places for solemn worship. 7th. Drowsiness in times of worship was complained of in our
Answers brought in to the Quar.ly Meeting of business; whereupon
I was concerned to bring into consideration, whether high, luxurious
eating & drinking Cider, Wine &c, plentifully, with smoking tobacco,
did not tend in some measure to alter the state of the body, and thereby
add to the causes of heavy dullness when friends come to sit down in our religious Meetings. That of paying a kind attention to the Situation of the Native
Indians who dwell near us, by visiting them, & inspecting as well as helping their neces-
sities, as winter is approaching, and we much indebted to them, as such
who possess the Land which was theirs, & obtained from them at a cheap
rate, was at this time urged to friends Observation as a Christian
duty; My mind is often concerted for that people. 11th. I was at Evesham Mo.ly Meeting in company with several
ministring friends: I have often thought that the time in our meetings for business
ought to be occupied in attending thereto, and not taken up with com-
munications in the way of preaching; Life and power far exceed
words. 12th. My mind was turned in feeling sympathy towards
the poor and afflicted, divers of whom I visited: one of them was
antient, whose time seemed nearly over, and I feared his days work was
not done; I urged him to use all diligence. At another house, I went to see an afflicted woman, and her
mother who was a widow, they rejoiced at being visited; and I
tho't they appear'd much in the innocency, like favourites of
Heaven. 13th. At a neighboring Meeting, I thought insensibility, and
forgetfulness of God prevailed; with a worldly spirit to my grief. 17th. At our week day meeting, I hoped for an increase of living
Faith and life among us; Friends seem to bring out more of the youth
to meetings then heretofore. ---- I visited a number more of the
poor and afflicted, who appeared thankful in being remembred. 24th. At Pilesgrove Mo.ly Meeting was a trying time; I seemed almost
ready to give out, the appearance was gloomy, and the floods
ready to swallow me up; I feared also the Lord was about to hide
his face from me: ---- I said, Suffer me not, O Lord, to fall a
prey to mine Adversary: I know my help is in thee. -----
Next day I visited some in deep affliction of body, whom I thought
were in favour with God, a comfortable feeling. 27th. At Salem Meeting I had close doctrine doctrine to deliver which
seemed well taken, At their Monthly Meeting next day, my
bow seemed to be renewed in strength; and I had close labour to discharge
both amongst Men friends and the Women, to my own satisfaction, and to
theirs, as far as appear'd. I was led to treat on the pernicious Effects
of a worldly Spirit, and a sumptuous way of living, aiming at fine
Houses, rich furniture, particularly large looking-glasses &c, &c:. 
Returning 
 Returning home I visited several sick persons to our mutual
Joy. At our week day meeting, were a large number of Youth; a good
Meeting crowned with the divine presence. 1796 1st. month. For six days I have been about home, & done little good.
Instead of attending with other Friends the committee on In-
dian Affairs, I let in reasoning, that I was of so little conse-
quence, I might as well stay away; and thus have lost time. 8th. My mind was inclined to attend a neighboring Mo.ly Meeting, but
the Adversary endeavour'd to defeat me here also: I was kept lingering
about home till it was almost too late; when trembling seized
me; & I said, let me not fall by the hand of Saul; I was favoured
with a little Strength to press thro': and my bow was renewed, so
that I had a favoured Opportunity, both amongst Men and Women friends.
I was engaged to speak to Parents and Children concerning a
 worldly spirit, and the inconsistency of Superfluity in dress and
 furniture; and had to press in plain Language the evil of these
Things; believing it was not a time for speaking smooth Words. It was
thought the meeting ended well. I also attended another Monthly Meeting next day where my
service was pretty much in the same line; And I can say in
truth, Blessed be the name of the Lord; He is a rich rewarder
of those who serve him faithfully. 11th. I was at our Monthly Meeting at Haddonfield, Where the
Minutes of our Yearly Meeting were revived which advise against 
 a worldly Spirit, & mention it's weakening effects in leading to the
vain customs of the World in dress &c: I was led on this oc-
casion to speak plain, and closely urge my friends to a proper
attention to this advice, with other matters recommended; It appear'd
evident to me that giving way to fleshly ease, and a worldly Spi-
rit, was the ground cause of a defection in our Society, & a depar-
ture from that Simplicity which the dictates of the blessed Truth,
if strictly observed, would lead into. Some of the rich can scarce-
ly bear this kind of doctrine, especially Parents; The Children
sometimes appear most tender. -- I had also to express my fears
respecting the dangerous consequence of friends mixing with others
in promoting a School at Haddonfield for instructing Youth in the
French Language: as it might be a snare to entangle some of
the dear Youth, & expose them to the Company of those of a loose
conduct &c. Tho' some seemed to disapprove of my freedom in this
respect, several both Old and young united with my Sentiments. 12th. I was at Woodberry Monthly Meeting: where a worldly spirit
was again treated on, with its' effects: I opened my Sentiments on what
relates to extortion; and had to advise my friends not to seek the largest
Prices when they were about to sell, Meat or other produce, especially to
those in low circumstances: This appear'd to be a low time: and I was
afraid my friends in this place had lost ground. 18th. At our Meeting lately we had the company of four friends who were 
Ministers, 
 Ministers. It came into my mind that in a season of drought, we
we looked to the clouds for rain; sometimes many clouds produce but little -
rain, so when divers preachers are in the gallery, & the minds of the
people turned towards them, & not to the bishop of Souls, a disappointment
often happens. 24th. I have done no good thing. For several days after this, I was closely engaged in visiting
the sick, and in assisting, and pleading the cause of the poor, to my
comfort, and I hope, to their benefit. 2nd month 1st. I was at Burlington Mo.ly Meeting, & had some service
both amongst Men friends & the Women, tho' it seemed hard work, because
of lukewarmness, and I feared the World was likely to gain Ascendancy. 2nd. Attending also the Mo.ly Meeting at Chesterfield, it appeared to be
a low season, & part of the time unprofitably spent; Some who had more
of the form than substance urging sentiments to carry their Point, I thought
 it was distressing to some younger persons, & so it was to me. 3rd. Springfield Monthly meeting held to day, I thought was a more
favour'd time in the management of their business; Friends seemed to
be united, & the Youth sat solidly, which was pleasant to observe.
I had a comforting time in a Family yesterday evening; the Chil-
dren appear'd in a good degree of innocence. (C. Newbolds. ) 4th. At the Monthly Meeting of Mount-holly, I thought matters
were in a low condition, scarcely managed to the honour of Truth:
as life seem'd wanting. -- In the evening I visisted one who
had been an old Professor, hurt by taking strong drink to excess; I dealt
closely with him, as I took him to be deceiver. I visited a family of Methodists, who seemed well disposed: they were
tender & expressed satisfaction. 5th. I likewise attended Evesham Mo.ly Meeting, and was afraid friends
 were rather on the decline, as to the ground work of religion. The spirit
of the world often gets too much place in the hearts of Professors, and then
the good seed is choked, so that it cannot flourish to the honour of the
Great Husbandman. --- I felt much stripping after I came home,
but on visiting some of the Poor, & those in Affliction, I was comforted;
and had cause to bless, & praise the Name of the Israel's God. 8th. At our Monthly Meeting I opened my concern to visit
the Families belonging to our Meeting of Newtown; and to hold
a few Meetings near the river side, which my friends united with,
I was induced to express my Concern also, about so great a Con-course
of People coming to our Quarterly Meeting, & the disorders often seen
among them. 14th. On first day we had a favoured Meeting
at Newtown: a searching testimony was delivered by our friend
S.S. many hearts both of young and old were tendered. 15th. -- I thought I had some clear openings, respecting the manner of
holding our Meetings for discipline, in the authority of Truth. 18th. Being at a Meeting held in a School House near the River, I was
concern'd on the subject of dwarfishness, which is apt to overtake
Friends both Men and women, in a religious Sense; where the Spirit
of the World is allowed to gain Place: O how it hinders the Growth
of the blessed Truth! 21st. In visiting the poor and afflicted, I find some who 
are 
 are in a good degree tender & sweet-spirited: one of whom I thought
had too much confidence in the doctor, which gave me concern. Doctors
we see are often men of loose principles, not fit for religious Minds
to place reliance on. On further visits to some in straitned Circum-
stances, I find Comfort: I am often tried with great poverty of Spirit,
I therefore own those as my brethren and sisters in tribulation, 3rd. month, 13th I have for near two weeks been engaged in visiting the fami-
lies mention'd before, to my satisfaction; many of the visited also -
express the same: more friends are observed to attend Meetings than
were seen a while past, or before this Visit. 14th. I thought our
Monthly Meeting at this time was pretty well conducted. 15th. I attended the Meeting at Moorestown, & sat with a Committee
who had under Consideration the subjects mention'd in the Yearly Meetings
minutes relative to a worldly Spirit &c: I had some close labour touch-
this root of all evil, the Love of money; It seems to go hard with
some old folks, & those who are eagerly pursuing outward wealth: So
secure were some, they were ready to say, "Touch me not:" But I told
them, Joseph, or little David, was yet alive; Therefore let no man's
heart fail him. The next day at Upper-Evesham Meet-
ing, I had to speak of dangers that may happen, if the Watchmen
fall asleep, and give not the alarm at the approach of the
enemy. It appear'd that now worldly spirit was advancing fast
into our Society, & for want of faithful, wakeful, Watchmen, 
many 
 many with their sons and their daughters, are likely to be taken captive;
the rich are getting more riches; but the poor are oppressed; and I be-
lieved the time loudly called for an Alteration; and that now Rye
and Corn sold for so high a price, and other things high also, Friends
example in moderation might be loud preaching; even if we
could submit to supply the poor at one third lower than the
 highest price; what a pleasant Savour it would yield in the
country round us. These sentiments it seemed right for me to
press home to my friends closely. 17th. Attending Haddonfield Meeting, I had to mention the manner
in which we ruled the Ox and the Ass, which are bought with
our money, & therefore - ought to be subject under us; to come or go at
our bidding: But ourselves, who are bought at a higher price, by
the Saviour of the world, do not obey him as our Great Master,
nor keep his holy Law: Thus, are we not more stubborn than the brutes?
If the brutes obey not, we give them stripes: And must not the
Lord chastise us for disobedience? -- We may consider for our-
selves; As we whip harder for the second Offence, may we not look
for the same measure ourselves, if still disobedient? As the inhabi-
tants of this place have been lately visited by the rod of Sickness,
and many numbered to the silent Grave, of different Ages & sexes:
and have not some been raised as from the grave, and spared longer,
who have made promises of amendment in the affliction, yet have
not kept them? Will not the Lord visit again, by Sword, Famine 
or 
 or pestilence? I had to press these things for close consideration. 19th. I have several times visited a sick friend, who said she felt a sweet
calm; that she had all she could look for; death was no terror; adding,
Oh how trying would a wounded conscience be, at such a time as this! 24th. I was at Pilesgrove Mo.ly Meeting as poor and low, I thought,
as I ever felt myself. Next day at our Quarterly Meeting, I thought
it right to mention the situation of two old Jersey Indians near us; one of whom
is about 80 years old, & the other blind, about 60, for whom I have been
concern'd that they may be properly cared for: a committee was appointed to
attend to their Case. 26th. Attending our General Spring Meeting in Philadelphia, I be-
lieve it was a favoured Season, remarkably so. Our English friends Debo-
rah Darby & Rebecca Young attended, being nearly ready to return
after accomplishing their religious visit in America; Our Friends Sam.l
Emlen, Will.m Savery , & two Women friends, going over with them; they
all obtained Certificates at this Meeting. Sitting with the Committee on Indian Affairs, I was concerned
to open my Sentiments concerning the propriety of taking the situa-
tion of our Jersey Indians, under care, as well as those more re-
mote from our dwellings: as I remember to have heard my father
 often mention the Indians Kindness to our Predecessors in the Jer-
seys, when they were few, & the Indians many. 3rd. I attended a Meeting held in a School-House over Cooper's Creek,
a large and solid Meeting, which ended well. On the 5th I had a Meeting
at a School-house near Gloucester, not very large on account of a
Burial, & visited four families afternoon; and the next day five fami-
lies, which closed our Visit to families of Newtown Meeting; about
90, to our comfort, & the satisfaction of those visited, for ought that
appear'd. 10th. I have visited several other sick persons, not with-
 out a reward, & had two pretty large Meetings in School-houses to good
satisfaction. 11th. At our monthly Meeting I laid before my friends the continu-
ance of a concern to pay a farther Visit within the Governments of
 New-York & Canada, which was referred to the next meeting. 13th. Visiting sick people, of whom there are many; and some die
at short Warning: to me the season seems alarming, & I fear hard-
ness of heart increaseth; with extortion in high prices, as though there
would not be a living for the poor: Oh the Worldly spirit which prevails;
Will not the Lord be angry, & stretch forth his hand more severely? 15th. Again, I have visited several who were under deep bodily
infirmity; the State of whom caused serious contemplation concern-
ing some circumstances: Some are falling out with one another by the
way, contending about things which appear to be of so little worth
in a dying hour, that there is no name of a small enough Value to
call them by. Oh that all would try to be rich in good Works! 1796. 4th mo.
 17th. I thought I saw the enemy had made an inroad amongst us
by stirring up discord, and setting friends at variance with one a-
nother in strong parties, both pleading they were right: when it appear'd
to me, both were wrong, & gave way too much to thinking evil; For this I
was grieved, and laboured with both, to be at peace. The love of the
world was the beginning of this: When that prevails, such are its' fruits. 19th. I have been visiting the sick: was humbled under a sense of the
speedy calls from time to eternity, in this day of too general depravity.
Many trying days I have to pass through; perhaps all for my good:
these are not joyous; but if they the better prepare me for the Lord's
work, his Will be done. At Pilesgrove meeting the 21st I was enabled
to do what I believed to be my part, faithfully. The same day was at
a place where a marriage dinner was soon to be provided for my young--
est son, I had to open my mind on the subject of such entertainments
freely, & with some weight: pressing the necessity of true Moderation, and
advising against what has crept in relating to the ceremony of particular
waiting on the Bride & Groom so called, My advice had a Place in the --
minds of those concerned; The company at that marriage was small, I attend-
ed, and was pleased to see a good degree of right order observed. Much loose
and disorderly conduct at might be prevented by timely care, which
should be exercised, by friends rightly concerned, whether elder or younger. 25th. For some days, Sorrow, triels and grievous temptations have
attended; Yet I believe I had some service amongst the poor, afflicted
Widows and Fatherless Children, in and near Salem, whom I have visited.
At Salem Mo.ly Meeting next day, I had much Labour both in
Men's and Women's apartment to good satisfaction. I
 I have had to review the Vanity which prevails with the young
People of our time, and the Avarice & Extortion that seem visible among
older Ones, which produce mournful feelings. Nor has it felt pleasant to
my exercised mind to observe so much of the free use of Silk in for
for clothing in our Country, which is so plentiful for Wool and flax; Might not
these seem to be sufficient on many occasions, without showing the desire
of over much delicacy. --- I have been at Greenwich and Woodberry
 Meetings, where Poverty was perceived, I fear the Truth is at a low
 ebb among too many of us. 5th mo I have apprehended the Hearts of many professors resemble the sto-
ny ground; So that altho' favour to them is renewed, for want of depth in
root they fall into old customs again. Close work on answering the Queries in our Preparative Meeting; I
feared that evasive answers to them, would be likely to become a Snare. 8th. I had to minister Sound Truths, tho' it seemed hard work; and
hard for people to hear; yet I hope our Meeting ended Well to day. Next day was our Monthly Meeting: where my Concern mention'd last
month was united with, and a certificate granted according to my
prospect, signed with Unanimity. The day following I had a desire
to See a number of friends come together at a suitable time & place, who had
let in hardness one against another; which desire prevailed, so that a time
was fixed, all uniting therewith except one person who had lost his right
amongst us: He went to the others, with a view to discourage their attending, and 
 and then told me he had seen them; that they did not purpose to attend
neither did he: I said, he might use his Pleasure: I intend to go to
the place, and if none came, I could sit quietly by Self, and had nothing
nothing prepared to say. Yet at the set time, the Friends all came, except
that Man's Wife, and we had a favourd season which had a uniting ten-
dency; I could say I was thankful for it, that I loved them, and did -
believe they loved me. 12th. The time is near approaching that I must leave leave near connections and all,
again, and be come as a Pilgrim, which I think is for the cause of Truth, &
good of souls; Taking leave of my friends in much love at our
week day meeting, many tears were shed; After I left home I found
 my mind secretly turned, to try to be at Bordentown, and getting there, I had
cause to believe it was right; though I see but little way before me. 15th. On first day I was at a pretty large Meeting there; and at Trenton
another, in the afternoon: The last especially was a favoured season.
I was now a little revived, believing I was in my proper place thus far. The next day at Lamberton, where is no religious Meeting held,
nor Meeting house of any Sort, I had a large Meeting in an empty
store-house, and feeling my heart so much enlarged in love to the
People, I seem'd constrained to stand near two hours on my feet; which
almost surprised me: it having been uncommon with me to stand above
half so long; This was a highly favoured season, and many hearts
were tendered; my mind was also bowed in thankful reverence before my
divine Master: Many of different Ranks, both black and White came to 
 to take leave of me, with tears trickling down: my tears also were min-
gled with theirs. It truly was a comfortable time. A more solid mee-
ting, or greater attention, I think I never saw before at any time
or place, than what was observable here on this occasion. Next day, travelling to Rahaway , I thought none had to feel
more of inward poverty than poor me: yet as the Lord is not wanting
to assist his devoted ones in the needful time, there is no cause
for murmuring. 18th. At a kind friends house, there was sent in the afternoon a fine
riding waggon with nice horses, for that friends wife and me to
ride in to visit her mother and some others. I told her I had no ob-
jection to going, yet was not free to ride in that carriage, nor
with such Horses; but I could go on foot, and she might ride in it,
as a late rain caused the roads to be wet & unpleasant walking.
This was a trial to us both, as she appear'd to be a good spirited
woman: but I believed it best for me to hold forth my testimony
for simplicity, and lowly mindedness. 19th. I was at Raha-
way Monthly Meeting, and at an evening Meeting appointed by my
Friend J. S. held here; These seemed to be laborious Seasons
though attended by many friends on their Way to Yearly Meeting at N. Y.ork
Reaching to that city next day, I was somewhat comforted: many
Friends kindly came to see me. 21st. The Yearly Meeting of Ministers and Elders began, at wch
were our Friends John Wigham and Martha Rowuth from Europe, with
others out of other Parts; a second sitting thereof was in the afternoon,
low times to me: I thought many of us were got into a state of easy
indulgence in many things, and are not soon to be removed from
 Beds of Ease: I tried at it a little, yet not to much purpose. I hinted
 that the benefit & well ordering of this large Yearly Meeting, wou'd
much depend on the wise Conduct of those in high Stations: guarding
well their own Example & Conversation, and then watching over younger
People carefully; checking their going on formal visits from house
to house; that if favoured to receive a little good, they might lose it's Sa-
vour, or learn bad fashions or unprofitable Customs, by getting into Com-
panies, and indulging Vanities, so as to be in danger of returning
from such a Solemnity worse than when they came to it: That of sitt-
ing up late in the Evenings, & laying in bed late in the mornings I had also to
mention my belief, it was unprofitable for Body and Soul. I thought
this kind of Doctrine seemed rather hard or close for me to deliver
among Brethren & Sisters of high rank in a large City, and though
lately visited with alarming mortality, I fear too many are not enough
humbled. 23d. The meeting of Business began, which in most of it's Sittings
seem'd times of exercise, the Stream being low, as I thought; Members being
too generally tinctured more or less with a Worldly Spirit, know not the
proper value of the precious Truth, & thus become captivated,
barren & dwarfish. 
At At one Sitting of the select Meeting, on 4th day morning, The truth
appeared to have comfortable dominion: My mind in the liberty thereof was
emboldened to inform my brethren and Sisters of my exercise on observing a
custom to prevail in the City which I thought was not right; and if I differed from
all my friends in Sentiment I hoped I might be excused; It was that of employ-
ing men to do women's Work in houses, &c: That I did not doubt there being wo-
men enough, healthy, & capable of business if their minds were applied
thereto, to do all that was necessary in Families: And as provisions were dear,
and men's labour high rated, they had better be imployed in the fields, or
out door business, than at Womens work; If the young Women were to be
brought up in a course of family industry, and to rise early in the
morning, I believed it might contribute to health, and tend to fit many of
them better for business, & the managing houshold affairs, if they should
come to need that, than if brought up in an easy delicate Manner: having
seen some such in my time who have been reduced to great hardship and
unable then to minister to their own necessities; and perhaps there may
 be instances of this kind proceeding out of Families where men had
been employ'd to do women's Work, and children indulged in a delicate idle
life. Tho' my testimony on this head seemed to go hard with some
 to whom it might seem applicable, Yet I found it had the concurrence
of many friends who expressed unity therewith. It was also proposed by
one friend that a Minute of the substance of the concern be taken on
their book which was also agreed to. -- This was a memorable time, the
Power of Truth in dominion, lofty Spirits chained down, the rich &
great having to submit to the simple discipline prevalent in the present sea-
son 
 In a following sitting of Ministers & Elders the same
concern was strengthened by others and friends in the city & country closely ad
vised to attend to the Contents of what was taken on minute at the former
Sitting. The Bow seemed (as I believed) to be at this season, renewed &
strengthened by the Lord's Power, in the hands of some little Ones,
who had to shoot their Arrows against the Queen of Pride. I did not
find my self clear without also hinting my exercise on the growing Custom
of friends having fine Carpets, and flowery Things in their rooms; which
I believed were not brought into use by the dictates of simple Truth, and that
a number of such matters might well be spared, and thus help might be
administerd towards warming and covering many of the Poor. 28th. The Yearly Meeting ended the 28th with a publick Meeting.
I was exceedingly stripped that Evening; having to confess with the
Prophet of Old, "I am a Worm, and no man." So great was my poverty
that I feared I should murmur; there seeming to be no sense of good left.
But I tried to get into quietude, therein to know what further the
Lord had for me to do. Next day being the first of the Week, there
 were held 3 meetings in the City: The last of which was appointed
for the Youth of all descriptions: These were large and I
thought ended well, yet not so highly favoured as some have been. Here I parted with my beloved Friends J. Wigham and M. Routh .
each turning to our own Allotments in the Master's work, John , to
 Long-Island, Martha to the Northern Meetings in this Govern-
ment, and I towards the Genesee Country & Upper Canada. 30th. Musing on the State of Things, I fear'd that since the late
mortality, The People in this City are grown rather Worse than 
better 
 better: This is cause of grief to many as well as myself,
tho' I do not see I have any further to do in the Place. 5th mo. 31st. Next day I left New-York, as one having none Inheritance on earth;
travelled about 40 miles to Croton River, and had a pretty
large meeting that evening on Short Notice, which proved reviving, and satis-
factory, believing it ended to the honor of Truth. 6th. mo. 1st I went about 40 miles further to a friend's House near the
 North River: and the next day, was at their week day Meet-
at Swago, which was small, yet in measure favored; after
which I visited an aged friend under bodily affliction: of body
but in a heavenly frame of mind: Who, although his Pain was
great, refused the taking of Laudanum as a medicine, lest it
might tend to stupify his Senses, near the close of Life, by it's
benumbing Effects; I much approved of his religious Caution herein:
fully believing it has often been handed out by Doctors in an unrigh-
teous manner; which in some instances may injure the clear
understanding of departing Souls, in their last Moments. I am informed by a friend who says he had it from the
Mouths of two merchants in N. York who were in Partnership, That
in the Summer of last year, they imported from the East Indies
 Teas, and Silks: on which the duties which were to be paid, amounted
to more than one hundred thousand Dollars. And as it is
said much of those Duties goes towards defraying the expences of
War, I do not see How friends can consistent with a clear testimony
to that pure principle which stands against all cruelty and
bloody measures, freely purchase and use the Goods, on which such Duties 
 duties are laid; it being (as I take it,) generally agreed that
those who use or consume the Articles so circumstanced, do
pay the Duties. Such are my tender scruples & Testimony;
and so I leave it for others to look at, perhaps when I am
dead and gone; believing it to be what was given me to bear, and
attend to in simplicity and integrity of heart. 
 Joshua Evens . The 3rd. I proceeded on my Way and came to Z. Green 's: had a solid
time in his family: several young Women were there, & it was a satis-
factory season. I also visited an aged woman friend, of a heavenly
mind as I believed. I have to wait a little for a companion; feeling
inward Calmness: This I take to be a divine Gift, to support a
tottering mind. 5th I was at the Creek Meeting (Ninepartners), where strength was
given me to labour (I believe) to the honour of Truth, and my
own comfort: next day, my companion
coming, we rode to Little nine Partners, and the day after that
upon short notice, had a pretty large Meeting to good satisfac-
tion, at Cattskil, amongst the Presbyterians. 8th Crossing the North River here, we proceeded westward toward Unedilly:
I felt myself as a Stranger in a strange land; yet perceived a
little something which inwardly sweeten's the mind: The next day
we went much the same Course, thro' a Wilderness, where the
mountains were admirably high, which seemed awful; and travel-
ling was very difficult among Roots, Rocks and Mire: Sometimes we 
seemed 
 seemed to be surrounded in such a manner with mountains as -
though there would be no way. Here it was hinted to mind, "Look not
outwardly, but to the Lord, & the Path:" I then felt more easy, scarcely
daring for a while to raise my head, or look about me. The Road -
also continued difficult the next day, but I was favour'd with a sweet
calm: -- I thought perhaps many of my friends were in another
way toiling themselves, in trying to get riches, & leave their Children
 rich, and I struggling along thus might migh come to die out-
 wardly poor: But my mind was touched on this wise; Thy Riches
come another way; if thou art faithful, thy reward shall be sure,
and sufficient. 10th We crossed the River Susque-
-hanna near Unedilly: Enquiring for a friend's house we had heard of:
 it being also near night, and receiving no account of him, it seemed a
discouraging circumstance in a wilderness place; But going a little further on
we obtained lodging; & were informed he lived about fifteen Miles dis-
tant. --- The following day about noon, we reached to Green Halls:
 Having now travelled near 160 Miles through a remarkable road
for difficulties. I have no cause to murmur, feeling the Lord to be near
as a kind Master. On the On the 12th. we had a Meeting at this house; and
in the afternoon another in a School-house, which were consider-
able gatherings, and might be called Seasons wherein divine Good-
ness was dispensed; The solid & quiet Sitting of the People, was
comforting to me to behold. --- 13th. Had a Meeting at Zeb.n Smith 's
by the Unedilly River, among a People who were much unac-
quainted with friends. There was an appearance of much tender-
ness in these Meetings: and my heart was affected on hearing of the
Cries of some of the Poor for want of bread; It seems they have an 
extortionate 
 extortionate teacher, or Priest, to maintain, and a great scarcity
of grain here; Some have been (they say) several days without bread.
Also some who went 30 miles to buy, & brought the Corn home on their
backs. We called at one place, where was a woman and three Chil-
dren besides one at her breast; whose husband was out seeking bread.
 She said they had been two days without, and knew not when
he would return. It was almost more than I could bear to hear of,
& observe the situation of these poor Children; That called the
House they sheltered in, was, a few logs put up, and brush thrown
 on the top; When it rained they suffered much, having to stand
 or sit the whole night, some times in the wet, and without fire. 14th Had a Meeting in a place called Shenang, at T. Lions , about
five Miles west of the Unedilly River, among a People not
acquinted with friends; the gathering was so large, I wonder'd where
all the People came from; In the afternoon, another at Green-
Halls; these were favour'd seasons; in the last especially, the hearts of
many were melted into tenderness. With respect to G. Hall & Lydia 
his wife, I had reason to believe (if they were faithful) the Lord would
prepare them for usefulness in this wilderness Country. 16th. We now took leave of our friends of this place in much near-
ness: it seemed hard for them part with us: and travelled
through a rough way to Ottego: here I met with some of my kinsfolk
and acquaintance, and we were kindly received by a Son of John
Sleeper's: The next day had a pretty large Meeting to good satisfaction 
in 

in a new barn of Bn. Sleeper 's: The day following at the same place
we had one with those who professed, or had a friendly education,
which ended to my comfort and theirs also: We found them in
a tried Spot: Some who had come hither to settle, appearing in measure
friend-like, had conducted in a shameful, dishonest way, rather drunken,
and disposers of goods which were sent here damaged & of small
value; endeavouring to cheat, & take advantage of Poor People &c:
Such had left a stink behind them, and caused the way of Truth
 to be evilly spoken of, to the grief of some tender spirited little ones.
O the mischief and wrongs some Traders are guilty of, profess what
they may, who send into those new Countries, Old Shops Goods, not
easily to be sold in more populous Places; in this manner defraud-
ing & oppressing Poor people & new Settlers; Will not the Cry of these
corrupt deeds reach the ears of Heaven's King, and call for a scourge
on the workers of such Iniquity. Having been an Eye wit-
ness & mourner on these accounts, or having cause to believe the
Truth of such Complaints, I think I shall not stand clear in my
duty, without making, and leaving remarks as things occur. On first day the 19th. had a Solid quiet Meeting in the barn
above mention'd which I thought ended to the honour of Truth: This
was supposed to be the largest gathering ever known in these parts 20th. Visited several families, & had a Meeting in Sl. Sleepers Grist Mill,
 pretty large, but long in gathering, which hurt the service; it ended
well. The people for quiet orderly sitting were remarkable. 21st We went to see some families, two of which were my eldest Sis-
ters daughters, they live at Otego: Also had a Meeting about eight
miles up the creek at Nicho.s Coggeshal 's, remarked for a time of
favour. A deacon of the Baptist Society at the conclusion, said
he could say, Amen, to the testimony which was preached; that not
 a word had been spoken but what he united with; and altho' he
was old, he never had been at a friends' meeting before. I then
return'd to my beloved friends near Otego, named John Brightman ,
John Matthewson & Isaac Carr , who had Families; with others there
who I think deserve the notice of friends: These have suffered
much by the misconduct of some (as before hinted) who proved dishonest,
and as stumbling blocks to tender enquirers. 23d. We had a farewell Meeting in Sleeper 's barn; satisfactory.
This being a time near our parting, we visited other families:
some with tears expressed their Sorrow at our leaving them. -
Here are some tender-spirited little Ones, who felt near and dear,
whose Condition for reasons aforesaid hath been trying. 24th. I was this day in a low state of mind: Rode to Cooper's-town
on the east end of Otego; a Spot beautiful for Situation. Here
unexpectedly, we were kindly received by Wm. Cooper , then Judge
of the Court, & his sister , altho' Strangers. He queried whether I stood 
in 
 in need of Money, and if I did, he was willing to supply me, he said.
 also unknown to me, he wrote an Order, that if at any time, whilst
in these northern parts, I should have occasion, I might draw
on him, which he would cheerfully answer. -- Finding the roads
very difficult, here I sold my waggon, & some other things, and
provided myself to ride on my mare, with the kind assistance of
 Judge Cooper & his sister; having cause to remember them both:
we had a solid, good meeting at this place, which to some, was a
tendering season. The 25th. in the morning we left Cooper's-town,
and travelled near 50 miles to Duane's-Bush; This was as try-
ing as my nature could well bear: Towards the latter part we came
to a family of poor Irish people: Here we got down to rest ourselves &
horses a little, it being very warm weather; and I much fatigued; Here tho'
not at all agreeable, I thought we must stay that night: Yet were, af-
 ter after resting awhile, favour'd to reach Walter Briggs 's, our desired
Place. -- The next day, had two pretty large Meetings held in
a Barn at Duanes-bush; one of which was a favour'd time; the other
 more exercising, the minds of the People being outward. 27th. We had a meeting at W. Briggs 's, in a new framed house, which was
large, & ended well; the people appearing solid. We have no cause to
murmur: we want for nothing, The Lord being good, and doth marvel-
lously open the way: Unto whom be all Glory & Praise, forever, Amen.
We now propose to go up the Mohock river; but how far, we cannot say. 
This 
 This W. Briggs is a friendly man; he lives near that River.
I have been fearful on the account of some, who seem likely to ac-
quire a large Share of outward wealth, whether it will not choke
the good Seed in their minds, except great Care is taken to keep humble. 28th This day we rode about 25 Miles to Thomas Almey 's; and the next, had
a smallish meeting in his barn, yet very quiet: The People were
strangers to our Meetings and manner of Worship; as there never had
been a meeting of the kind here before; and I believe this did not
cause any dishonour to the cause of Truth: I am now in a
poor state of health; but with kind friends, resting a little; and feel
my mind very calm: resigned to the divine Will. 7th. mo 1st. Travelling near 50 miles towards Whitstown, pretty comfort-
ably, we reached that place on the 2nd before noon. There I met
with my neighbor J. Cooper , & other friends appointed to visit the
Indians: And finding freedom to join them, we went in Company
that afternoon to an Indian Settlement called Brotherton: I under-
stand the number of these Indians is about 200, They have Cows,
Horses, Oxen &c: and hold as yet a Tract of good Land, about ten thou-
sand acres, and have an yearly income paid by New-York Go-
vernment of 2000 dollars for Lands sold thereto. ---
We were comfortably entertained by an Indian named George
Crosley; this is a kind family, speaking our language, and we find their daugh-
ter can read and write pretty well. As I have from my young years, been friendly disposed towards
the Native owners of our American Lands, and especially since Reli-
gion began to have place in my mind, have been often concerned on ac-
count 
 count of the wrongs and unfair dealings of my brethren the white
 Settlers of different Ranks, with Traders &c, which have, I fear,
taken Place in too many instances, to the great injury of the poor
Indians; I have therefore thought it right to leave some remarks to
posterity, here, and in other parts of my simple notes, of my Senti-
ments which have occured on this subject. ~ It appears that
in years back, some of the Indian Lands in this govern-
ment where I now am, were by them rented to some white-
people who settled thereon: After thus obtaining possession,
it seems those professed Christian white settlers refused to go off their rented lands:
also those who were in stations of government supposing, or
pretending they could not easily remove them, even if the In-
dians were the sufferers; and therefore advised that the lands
be sold to the government; and to promote a Sale, perhaps an
offer was made to the Indians, that an interest tho' much less than their Value or yearly
Income should be paid them in lieu of their Lands: Now to turn
the scale, & look at the treatment they have met with heretofore in
some places; How do we suppose the White people would remove
Indians, if they were to come intruding and settle on the real property of the Whites?
Would it not be likely that the Method of expelling them
by sword and gun would be adopted, without endeavoring to convince
or shew them, that the mild spirit of Christianity leads men to do
justly & strictly, to observe Equity one towards another in every nation
where it prevails. To me it remains a serious cause of real Concern 
 that in a Country of Professing Christians, whose predecessors
were permitted to come and settle on a part of the soil, allotted by
Divine Providence to native owners who are our brethren of his Creation: Who have been
renowned both before & since the corruption they imbibed through
the Fraud & bad example of white men, to be in general, kind and
hospitable, as well as remarkably punctual to their engagements: That
these poor natives in so many instances should justly have cause to com-
plain of wrongs, impositions, & unchristian treatment, through breach
of contracts, unjustly grasping after and obtaining their Lands, besides
the great abuse and disadvantage they have received by the hateful
practice of introducing strong Liquor, Whisky &c, among a weak, unguar-
ded & uncivilized People: And that these Complaints should undeniably
fix upon Men more knowing & civilized, who if the Spirit of the religion they profess was attended to
would find it incumbent on them to shew forth a very different Conduct, or a
treatment and Disposition much more likely to instruct, civilize and convert
those whom they term a savage & barbarous People. 7th. mo. 3rd ... To day we had two comfortable meetings at Brotherton,
attended by many of the Indians, both men and women. This People,
or many of them appear'd to have a deep sense of Favour. We parted
with them in much Love, and went to another Indian Settlement called
 Stockbridge, lodging at the house of a Chief called Captain Hendricks . 4th. The Committee having agreed to hold a Council with the Stockbridge
Indians
 Indians, I attended also. This was in consequence of Friends concern
 for their benefit & advancement in civilized life, and a desire to aff-
 ord them some assistance by giving them impliments such as axes, howes,
&c. This conference was not so satisfactory as we could desire; these In-
dians then shewing rather a coveting disposition, or looking for larger
gifts from friends than was proper to expect, or for them to be supplied
with so hastily: perhaps their expectations had been by some means
imprudently raised before our coming to see them. --- Before we
parted from this Council, so called, the Indians were informed that at
two hours from that time, I proposed to have a meeting at the same place
where we now met them. --- In consequensce of which notice a large
Number of them, men and women came together; It proved to be an
exercising Season, life was much wanting; many of them were ignorant
in our language, so that an interpreter was made use of, and I felt my
self poor at parting. -- I understand that the Portion of Land wch
these Stockbridge Indians possess, is said to be 23,000, Acres, and their
 number is about three hundred: Also that their yearly income from
the Government is 600 dollars; which might yield them more benefit
if a considerable part of it went not, or was not spent in Strong
drink, which I suppose has manifestly been too often the Case. 5th. Passing thro' the Town of the Tuscarora Tribe (who are but few or about 60 in num-
ber) we went to the settlement of Oneida Indians, where was held a
Council so called. Things here were not very pleasant, The Indians seem
 seem at times unsteady & fickle; by some means they were not plea-
sed, & the interpreter disordered with strong drink; these circumstan-
ces were very trying; But we informed them we were willing to have another
meeting, which was proposed for religious worship in the afternoon. This happened to be more trying still; for the Intepreter was so drun-
ken & poor a creature, I had but little freedom to speak by him, if suit-
 able matter had opened; so that my Sorrow was increased on seeing so
much drunkenness among Indians. -- From hence we returned to
 Stockbridge, & tarried there again that night; Captain Hendricks seems to
be a chief of some consequence & reputation, & his wife a well behaved
 woman so far as I saw. The Oneidas being
the largest of those Nations, are computed six hundred in number.
The Land they hold, called 150 thousand Acres, & their income from
government yearly, five thousand dollars. 6th The committee having goods to distribute among the Indians, the
business was finished this morning at Stockbridge: and many both men and women com-
ing to take leave; we had a favoured opportunity with them, wherein
greater tenderness appear'd, than in any other Season since we came to
visit them. --- We then went to the Place where three friends
propose staying a while among the Oneidas to instruct them; with
whom we had a solid parting season: after this, as many Indians
were come together near our departure from the Place, My desire
was
 was mention'd of sitting under yonder Trees a little while with as
 many of them, both men and women as were willing to come toge-
ther there, (shewing the place;) Upon which about 150 came; some
of whom being painted Red, black &c, seemed to make a frightful
Show as they sat on the ground; yet on the whole, their appear-
ance was then more solid that at the former times when we were with
them: so that our parting with the Oneidas, was in a way Mostly
 friendly: -- And yet as a portion of Death and darkness was per-
ceived rather than a pleasant feeling among them on these Visits:
altho' perhaps in their way of civility, their custom of saying,
Yough, is to give of assenting to what they hear deliver'd to them, yet to me
it was unpleasant at this time; and I have my doubts concerning some things.
This afternoon we went on about 12 miles towards the Onon-
dagoes; and having to lodge at an Indian Tavern, it seemed to
be a poor time: Yet I felt my mind quiet in a good degree, which
I esteem a high favour in these times of Trial. The Tuscaroes hinted of before, live on the Oneidas Land, and
have about two hundred acres allotted them: and it is said a proportion
of 4,500 dollars, perhaps, annually from the government. I understand that
murdering one another when involved in drunkenness, frequently happens
among Indians in these parts. Oh that White People may be concern'd to con-
duct so towards them, as not to be found chargeable with Guilt on account of
the Sins of Indians. 8th. After riding about 18 Miles further, a Council (as they
call it) was held among those called Onondago Indians: These
seemed not well pleased; as we found they upon some grounds had ex-
pectations of larger gifts or help from friends than they were now
 likely to obtain; This was trying again, and my feelings were un-
pleasant & mournful; O the necessity of prudence and wise steering,
if we propose to be useful to these uncultivated fellow Men. 9th. We now set forward towards the Cayuga Lake on a visit to those
called Cayuga Indians living there, who seemed poor and miserable
& like the others, disappointed in their expectations; We found their chiefs
were not at home, and that the end of our coming could not be answered to day,
we proposed tomorrow to have a meeting with some White People dwell-
ing near. 10th. So it being first day, we met, & sat comfortably with a
little gathering; it being a favoured season: here were some of the
scattered little ones, with whom my heart was tenderly affected.
In the afternoon we went to meet with the Indians, having spoken to
them on the subject the day before: and altho' none came at the time
proposed, we sat down, and I may say I was comforted in our Sitting
& concluded we had done well, though these poor creatures were very much igno-
rant of what we mean by Worship. On the On the 11th. a few Indians met with us in Council, who appeared misera-
ble, and some of them, I thought, then disorder'd with strong drink: we
had but little satisfaction, as they were looking for Gifts &c. Parting with them, I went from hence down the Cayuga
 lake, & crossing the ferry, came to a small Village, called Geneva,
where we lodged at a 
 1796.
7th mo. 
a tavern. --- From thence next day, to Canadocway; 12th. and tarrying a while at Israel Chapin's (who is the Indian
Agent) we went on to Nathan Cumstock's , near Mud-Creek
in the Genesee Country. 14th. At this place we had a Meeting in the forenoon, and one in
the afternoon which were pretty large; & solid favour'd seasons.
Then we went on to Abm. Lapham's . 15th. We visited seve-
ral families at, and near Mud-Creek. Then to Nathanl. Aldridges .
This seems to be a low flat Country, the water unwholsome,
& the Place sickly. -- Some asked me if I was not afraid of
being sick; I told them I thought I was not for I enjoy'd a quiet
mind, which I esteemed a great blessing; more especially when
- I am in the Lord's service. 15th. Next day at Jonn. Smith's , we
had a large and favoured Meeting, in which much tenderness ap-
peared among both old and young, a comfortable season to many.
This was about four Miles from Canadocwey. 16th. At Willm. Ingle's in the forenoon we had a pretty large mee-
ting, which was comfortable. And in the afternoon (in the)
at Canadocwy we had another, in the Court,house, not so
large, nor so much favour'd; yet it was agreeable to observe the
 people sat commendably quiet and attentive. 17th. Leaving this place, we travelled for five days towards
 Philadelphia, through an unpleasant mountainous Country, met with poor
fare for men & horses, & mean lodging; sometimes on the floor,
with swarms of fleas, &c; a Scarcity of bread was also apparent. Expences in travelling mount high; the road uneven and
mirey in Places: We are all favourd with health, being five in
number & have travelled in the five days near two hundred miles.
Many of the people through this back Country of late seemed to be
of the ungodly sort; and less room to receive the Principles
of Truth, than I have seen in my eastern Travels of near 7,000
miles; Tho' we have among them met with some who were more
 Friendly. On looking back over my travels, I believe I have endea-
vour'd honestly to discharge the trust the Lord reposed in me, thro'
the ability he afforded: Blessed forever be his great and holy Name,
who faileth not to help in the needful times, and rewards with the
answer of sweet peace. 24th. We are now at Munsy in Pennsylvania; have attended a
large Meeting among my friends & others, and had close Labour, wch.
seems to be well received. At Blooming-Grove (or Pine-Grove)
the next day, we visited a few friends who are lately come there:
 they appear thoughtful in some degree, & have a pretty large
flock of youth & innocent Children; This is N. Westward of Munsy, to-
wards the Alleganey Mountain: Here the day following we had
two meetings: one of them with our friends selected; and the other
for all that pleased to come; which, tho' attended with close Labor
were measurably satisfactory: much openness appear'd amongst
 them to hear the world preached, & many signified their Unity. 27th. Visited some families at Muncy to satisfaction. 28th. At Muncy we had a Meeting, the largest (they say) ever seen at
that Place, many more people than the house held, and one the
same day with friends by themselves; I had much labour
this day, my Shirt being wet with sweat, It was an humbling
season: Visited some families also. 29th -- We travelled hard to reach to the Meeting at Fishing-creek, near
20 Miles; it was large and solid, being the first held in their
new house. In my wearisom travel I have in many places
found that Truth was at a low ebb, though People have sat com-
mendably quiet, yet some raw & uncultivated have attended. 30th. Travelled hard again to reach Berwick, a little village on
the N. East branch of Susquehanna, where in the afternoon, had
a Meeting: it was pretty large, and held in the Court-house
 Chamber (Northumberland County:) the People appear'd well satis-
fied. A few friends dwell here, but no meeting settled. 31st. We went down the river in a boat which friends provided
to go to meeting at Catawissey town to which they belong, the
distance called 15 miles. This boat had in it 30 people, & would carry more.
They frequently attend their meeting in this way, and have to push back
up stream when they return: I mention this to encourage others,
that they may not let small matters prevent their diligence in divine
Worship. -- This being first day, we were at Meeting with friends and others
at Catawissey, which was not so favoured a season as many others. 8th mo. 1st. The next day we met with friends selected from others: It was a
humbling season to many, tending to unite us nearly in Love to each 
other
 other. After meeting visited some, sick, aged & infirm people
to my comfort & theirs. 2nd. The next day we went to Roaring-
creek meeting; a solid and favoured time. Near it's conclusion I
requested Friends not to go out when others did, for I thought a little
fragment remained for them. Here was a considerable number of Young-
people, who sat solidly, as did the Parents. A time not soon to be
forgotten, I hope. 3rd. After visiting some aged people, and
tender little ones acceptably, I returned to Catawissey. & the day
following, attended their week-day meeting: I thought it was a
solid season, also visited some aged & infirm people. 7th (I was this day at the week day meeting at Catawissey which was
a comfortable time;) The next Morning leaving this Place in two days, I
travelled through those called Blue Mountains, (a rough road, &
I was poorly & much fatigued, the distance near fifty Miles) 
to 
 to Maiden-Creek: On first day I was at that Meeting; it
was not very large, but an humbling season to many hearts of the
Youth and others; I believe it is not one that will be forgotten soon, by
the youth especially: This is mention'd to the Lord's praise; I know that not
any thing is due to mortal man: It is often my lot to enter the
meeting-houses as an empty vessel; my joints nearly trembling, for
fear any thing through me should give occasion for the holy
cause to be lightly spoken of: Let not the Lord's faithful servents
or Handmaids fail of being watchful, & dependent on him in the
most stripping seasons; so shall we know an establishment on the sure
rock, further and further. 9th. From Maiden-creek I went to a meeting in the town of Reading,
in Berks County; which was large, and I may say, solid: Here, (as
 has been common where I have travelled) were all sorts that chose to
come; some from curiosity to see, & to hear a man who wears his beard.
This circumstance has given me as large opportunity to see the people
whom I should not otherwise have seen. This Meeting, I believe
ended well; Let the praise be given to him who is our Holy Helper.
The next day, I was at Robinson meeting on the west side of
Schuylkill river; Tho' it was not large, it was a solid & favoured sea-
son; many hearts being tendered. 11th. I was next at Exeter; not a large meeting, and long in the
gathering; when assembled it was but a poor low time. I 
 I thought I was sensible of a dry lukewarm state; which is but too
 common amongst the highly favour'd People called Quakers: O how
the customs, the love and the spirit of the world have caused dim-
ness in some places. 12th. The following day I had a small meeting
at Potts-town; I thought the number of Women was largest here, &
they the most tender. I had close labour amongst them, which was
 well received, and I thought the meeting ended to the honour of the good
 cause: Divers gay people attended & sat solidly. 13th. From hence I travelled to Richland in Bucks County, in an exercised &
low state of mind, and was at two pretty large meetings there on first
 day, though I thought the truth was not permitted to come much into
dominion, either in the fore - or afternoon. 15th. From this place
I went to Plumstead, and had a meeting, pretty large; but so poor
 and low a time, I was almost ready to think all was over with me:
I had less opinion of preaching; desiring the people might have time
to think of their condition, and to seek for renewing of Strength: Are
not many under our name in a self secure state, Seeming to need
nothing. 16 The next Meeting I went to was at
Buckingham, which was very large, but laborious indeed; Here
I was sunk very low in my mind, began to think I was worse off
than in remote parts, or amongst the Indians: and near ready to say,
Are we the worst of all People, who above al, have been so pecu-
 liarly favored of the Lord. Oh, Ease, lukewarmness and worldly Spirit, 
what 
 What havok have ye made! It almost seemed to day as though I
had done with preaching. Yet there is a little hope that I am not forsaken. 17th. I next day attended a Sitting of select members at the same place, who
belong to that Monthly Meeting: which ended well; I believe the Truth
reigned over all. Here I was helped to Labour in the Lord's Cause, with
Weapons of his own preparing; The Arrows came so sharp against a-
gainst wrong things, that at length there was a yielding and confessing,
until hidden matters were laid open: Glory to his great Name now &
forever. 18th. I went the next day from Plumstead, to a Monthly
 Meeting, (not belonging to Bucks Quarter) Here, observing the State
of their Business and the management of it, there was really cause
of lamentation: When life and Power is wanting, but little can be done
to the Lord's honour, in the affairs which relate to discipline in his church. 19th obscurely expressed. I also attended a general Meeting held there. At this time I thought
it was given me to see clearly, there was a danger in being too free
in the use of A liberal flow of words in ministry; I fear there is a
possibility of that some, except unless they are better guarded, and speak not
 without the Spirit's pure influence, that they will be in danger of uttering Words
in publick resembling common talk, or of gratifying itching
Ear, instead of raising the witness of life in the Souls of the luke-
warm & disobedient. 20th Travelling towards Wrightstown, I was poor, wading as in the
deeps: Thinking that as I now feel, I can scarcely ever open my 
 my mouth in the Lord's cause any more. 21st Coming to Wrightstown, I attended their Meeting on first
day. Preaching seems to be looked for by many People, and
that of a smooth kind pleases best; this makes hard labour for
those who singly seek to serve the great Master uprightly: I
think I have not been more sensible of this, than since I came
nearer home: Those are large Meetings: but I have been at
 some much smaller, comparable to the two or three, with Minds tru-
ly turned turned to seek the fountain of life in themselves, which
 have been much more favored with the divine presence. 22d. The next day, had a Meeting at Makefield: A very
comfortable season it was to myself, and to friends in general,
I believe. My mind has not been favour'd with such a sweet
enjoyment of divine Goodness since I came into this County: Blessed
be the Great Shepherd of Israel: If the tender-hearted little
ones hold on their Way, I believe there will be a growth in the
 truth to some in this Meeting. 23d At Middletown there was held a large Meeting which ended
 well; and tho' laborious, I believe the Truth was in domi-
minion over all, to the tendering of many both Young and
Old. I had a pleasing prospect of some being brought forward into
usefulness who, if they keep their places may be made as Pillars
that shall go no more out. ---- This 24th This was the select Meeting held at the Falls for Bucks Quar-
 ter, at which I attended. It appeared to be a lively time: and I
thought that many things were well handled: It was agreed as
the general Sense of friends to form the answers in the Meeting which are to be
sent forward to our Queries; Pausing weightily on each query,
after reading it, and then endeavouring to represent the real
State; not seeking to hide or screen ourselves by evasive Answers.
The impropriety was opened of friends making too great provision
at Qu. Meetings &c, by preparing many Sorts of dishes, often
changing Plates, causing needless Work: The necessity was also hin-
ted of the foremost rank beginning to prepare, & lead the way towards true
moderation and temperance, their example being likely to have a power-
ful influence. 25th. On the day following was held their Qu.ly Meet-
ing for Business; wherein at this time the Stream of Truth's discipline
was low, as I believed: and I was ready to say, Alas, Alas; and so
to almost give out trying to labor for the benefit of the Cause I
I had been engaged in. -- But going to see some poor little Ones
in the afternoon, I was a little comforted, and strength renewed; for
I believe we were own'd by the Master in some of our conferences,
 on weighty subjects. 26th I likewise attended their Youth's Meeting at the Falls: poor
and low to some of us; yet no lack of preaching. I did believe
a weighty Silence might have done more good at that time, perhaps. 
And 26th And yet I leave these things to the Judge of all the Earth.
That evening I crossed Delaware to my son in law's; and the next day came
 home, finding my family in health; which with many other fa-
vours I have witnessed in my absence from them, I feel there is great
Cause of humble thankfulness to the God and Father of all our
mercies. --- Though, with respect to my outward home, I
feel myself but as a Sojourner or Pilgrim, Because of a
Prospect having been weightily opened to me, relating to a religi-
ous visit toward the Southern Parts of this Continent before Long, 
 if my health admits, and the way should be prepared
 with Clearness. 28th At our meeting on first day, tho' I with my friends rejoice
to see each other, (I believe never more so,) as I have been ab-
sent three months and more; yet we sat in silence, a degree of
mutual sympathy being felt. 31st I have visited several friends; have had serious thoughts
concerning reformation; and have believed those who go fore-
most in the work to real Profit, must pass thro' great exercises
 for self must become of no reputation, before we can bear the
cross, & despise the shame for Jesus Christ's sake; And as it was
with our worthy fore-fathers, Great trading, and many worldly
concerns, then "will be a great Burden": Fine houses and rich furni-
ture an Eyesore," with Sumptuous liveing, rich Tables, many dishes,
great attendance, and a lordly way of getting thro' the World &c, &c. In much sympathy with my fellow-members, my Spirit
hath for some years been deeply exercised on account of the state
of things in our society: And I have sometimes feared that wrong
things of late have grown fast among friends in a time of Peace
plenty and Ease. Surely if we let hurtful weeds grown, they check
the growth of good seed; So will wrong things, if we entertain them, check
our Progress in the narrow Way that leads to life: In that way, though
strait & narrow, there is liberty enough: And when we through a patient
coming to wear the Cross of Christ, come to experience the Liberty of the
blessed Truth, we may be then freed from that worst of all Burdens, the
world, and the idolatrous love thereof. ---- Oh that, if by here
 leaving a few sentences of my earnest desire, as a call to the beloved
 Youth of our day, I could prevail with many of them to come taste
and see how good the Lord is, to those who fully surrender their
hearts to his service; Then would your experience of his matchless
Love be sweet, and this language would often breathe forth, "Thy Ways
are ways of pleasantness, O Lord, and all thy Paths are Peace:" At
thy right hand are rivers of Pleasure, forevermore: For although
the Lord may see meet to hand unto you some of the Wormwood and
the Gall to partake of, Yet he will so sweeten the Cup to his little
Ones who are his sincere followers, that you will scarcely per-
ceive the Bitters: My soul in deep reverence can say, his Sweet
Peace for obedience for submitting to his requiring, has been sweeter than the 
Honey 
 Honey-comb. --- Oh that it was the happy experience of all
people, to submit to the refining Operations of the Grace which is
inwardly revealed; Then might they come to know the in-dwelling
of the peaceable Spirit of holy Jesus: This would put an
end to the quarrelling, & Jarrs, to hard thoughts and hard Speeches, and
introduce in us the coming of his Kingdom: Men would thus be taught
and enabled to love enemies, & to bear reviling for Christ's sake:
without reviling again: They would find no better way to gain 
Victory, than by overcoming evil with good. However hard this doc-
trine may seem to be to the natural will of Man, many living
Witnesses certainly know, that a state of this kind is attainable:
Therefore let no man's or Woman's heart fail them: All have the
offer of divine Grace and Assistance to overcome the evil part, &
none are excluded who are willing to close in, & obey the teachings
thereof; working while their day of Visitation lasteth; and often bearing
in mind, that "The night cometh, wherein no man can work." --
O that this might in some degree serve as a loud, loving
call, to my fellow-pilgrims, and sojourners throughout the Land. 9 mo. 3d. I Attended the monthly meetings at Mount-holly and Evesham
in this Month: I thought it seemed to be low Times, especially at the
first of them. At the select Meeting for Evesham on the 10th I had
close labour in true Love, respecting the things which have 
appear'd 
 appear'd to me superfluous, and inconsistant with respect to our
ancient testimony, relative to eating, drinking, wearing, using, &c,
similar to what I have free to hint of elswhere in the minutes
 I have made; and my present concern was well received as I believe. The same day I visited a couple newly married, who had both of them
former companions; The woman was poor, & the Man deemed rich;
I was concerned to speak closely on the snares and disadvantages
which have frequently attended second marriages, and the Necessity
there is for such Persons living steadily in the Lord's fear; and guard-
ing against tempers, & party views about worldly interest, where they
had children by former marriage: The woman was tender-spirited and
shed many tears: and I warned the man to beware of cramping her. 12th I returned my certificate at our Monthly Meeting, and gave my
Friends some account of my late journey & exercises. I also let
them know that as I returned homewards, a Prospect had opened
afresh, which I had a glimpse of before, & had told my wife, Yet it
seemed taken away from me after that: which was, of paying a reli-
gious visit to the Meetings of friends, & such service otherwise as way might open
for in the Southern parts, the Carolina's, &c. Wherewith my Friends con-
 curred, and directed a certificate to be prepared, the meeting ad-
journing for the purpose. 1796. 9th mo, 10th.
 About this time there was were many sickly, a number of whom
I visited. One woman being in great distress of mind, expressed her-
self after this manner, (expecting her stay on earth would not be long)
I did not think I had been so great a sinner until now. May it
serve as a warning to many: I have heard piercing lamentations
near their End, from others before I heard this womans expressions: The
cry of some has been, Alas! Alas! What shall I do. O the benefit of rightly
making use of precious time. 19th. My certificate was sign'd by a large number of my friends, and at
our quar.ly Meeting it was indorsed with approbation of friends there. 23d After that I prepared for my journey: tho' at times I was under great
poverty of spirit; had the company & sympathy of several friends
who came to See us; and in the midst of my exercised, I feel the Lord
near for my strength and Support, Blessed be his name, who is the God of
Abraham, of Isaac and Jacob. 4th. of 10th mo.
 Now I had to take an affectionate leave again of my dear wife
and all my outward connections, in obedience to the Master's call, as
I believe, and though poor in Spirit, was favourd with a sweet calm.
I crossed the Delaware to Philadelphia, proced'd by Wilmington,
towards the Susquehanna river; When I crossed the ferry there two
black men who were Slaves took me over: my mind enclined to pay
 them also, after paying ferriage to their Master. I reached to Bal- 
 timore on the 7th. The Yearly Meeting of Ministers and
 Elders began next day: 8th. It was thro' the Course of it's Sittings
& the Sittings for business in the next Week a time of suffer-
ing to me; & I believe I had brethren and Sisters in like Situation,
not perceiveing the Truth to rise into hight & dominion. I had a
little Strength to discharge my trust in the way I am led, in speak-
ing among the Select Members on the liberal use of Wine and smo-
king Tobacco; this was in the first sitting, and I believe was not
rejected by a remnent, after which I bore my burden mostly in si-
lence through the Sittings. O Lord, be pleased to keep my head
above the Waters, & leave me not in the most trying Seasons, wch
thou mayest permit to come, and then my soul shall bless and praise
thy adorable Name. 16th Perceiving my mind drawn to endeavour if I can to attend
the yearly Meeting in North-Carolina, I left Baltimore (having
(company provided) and went thro' a storm to a poor little Meeting
 at Elk-ridge. That afternoon & next day reached to Alexandria
in Virginia, and had a large meeting in the evening: where divine
favour was witnessed; & I believe the Truth was over all. 23d Passing forward to Roen Oak I had a Meeting there, or was at Meeting
there on first day, at which were a large number of black People
who sat solidly: On discoursing after meeting with several of
them, I found the manner they are treated as to food, Clothing & otherwise 
 was mean, & attended with considerable hardship and diffi-
culty. my mind was touched with Sympathy and a tender feel-
ing for their Condition. 25th. Reaching to Burleigh we were fa-
 voured with a solid comfortable Meeting there. Since I left Bal-
timore until I came here, my friend Charity Cook & her Sister Su-
sanna from South Carolina have been in Company with me, to good
Satisfaction, we now parted: and with the friend who bore me Comp-
 26th any I had a Meeting at Black-Water, which was in measure solid
and pretty large. On the 28th. we also had a pretty comfortable
meeting at a Place called Seacock; And the day following one at
the Western Branch; this was a time of very close searching per-
haps to some profit: I understood that two young men here
who never had been at one of our Meetings before, were consi-
derably reached & Affected. 30th. We now came to Little River in North-Carolina and attend-
ed a meeting there: & the next day began their Yearly Meeting
of business at the same place; The first sitting appear'd to me a low season
but in the next I thought business was conducted rather better,
& in the Sittings of this yearly Meeting, I thought there was much
 condescention among friends. The testimony against the im-
proper use of Distilled Spirits & the making such Liquors hath
not risen high in this Meeting, altho' friends had the subject before them.
I was with a Committee on the revival of their discipline and 
 and had some satisfaction, perceiving room to deliver my Sentiments
in a close way, on several subjects. nevertheless it was rather a suffer-
ing Season thro the Week. But there a considerable number of the tender, honest-hearted Friends. 3rd I had a large Meeting at New-begun Creek in Pasquo-
tank Coty: many of the people could not get seats in the house.
Many of the blacks or Slaves were at the meeting who sat
in a solid manner; appearing more humble than many of
the whites: Yet I believe it was a season of divine favour.
I understand the slaves in these in these parts, though
they fare hard with those who hold them, are commonly of
longer lives than the white People, who live sumptuously
on the fruits of their Toil: The Slaves allowance for a
week is in many instances confined to a peck of indian Corn
for one grown person, to cook it as they can, without meat, fat
or other addition; My heart was often tenderly affected at
 -- their condition. 5th. Next I had a large Meeting at the
Narrows Pasquotank, mostly not Friends. The people sat solid, and the meeting
ended to satisfaction. 6th On first day I was at a very
large Meeting at Symonds-Creek; one third part was sup-
posed to be of Blacks; a number were here of people who had
 not been at one of our Meetings before. It was a solid Season,
ending well, and appeared to general Satisfaction. After this Meet
ing we visited a Member of the Legislature: & treated on the
 subject of slavery, and their unrighteous Law which justifies 
the 
 the taking up and selling such for Slaves again, who are
set free, altho' by conscientious Persons who are not free to hold
them in Slavery: It afforded me comfort that he acknowledged
that Law to be unjust, hoped for its alteration, & proposed to use
what influence he had for it's repeal. or alteration. 7th Our next Meeting was at Sutton's-Creek, large, solid and
satisfactory: In these meetings I have been engaged in close
Service, which seems well received. From place to place I par
take of spiritual Poverty, Yet am not left with out a Hope
in the Lord, who putteth forth and goeth before: Blessed be his
glorious Name forever 8th. The next day two large Meetings,
in Pasquotank County, one at Wells 's and another at Beach
Spring: so large that the houses did not near hold the people. On the On the 9th. we were at Piney-woods Meeting; This also
was large, and to me exercising. -- At these Meetings many
black people attended, who behaved solidly. -- I then had to turn
back into Virginia again, about 36 miles to Jesse Cowpland 's.
On our way thither, it was affecting at different Places, to
observe the situation of the poor Slaves, Men, Women and
Children: a number of little ones quite naked, many others who were
grown up nearly so, or their covering little better then tat-
tered rags; It seems as though a continuance in Scenes of 
Cruelty 
 Cruelty hardens the hearts of unrighteous Slave-holders;
But how they will answer for the Sins attending this odious
Business, when brought to the bar of a righteous Judge, is a Subject
that occasions awfulness to serious Christian minds. 11th. We were now at a pretty large Meeting at Somerton, nearly
one third, were black people, & they, as well as others sat solid: this
was a satisfactory season, and many appeared tendered; close doc-
trine was delivered on behalf of Truth's cause, & seemed to be well re-
ceived. The The 12th. attended a select Meeting of the Quarter
held at Western-Branch, in much poverty. I believed there was
 a want of more living zeal amongst it's Members. 13th. Then had a large Meeting composed of people of different
Colours, which was held in Suffolk Courthouse, many more came
than the house did hold. It was a solid & favour'd Season; satisfactory
in general I believed; But one family of friends dwelt here at this time.
From hence we returned to the Widow Ann Scotts ', near the Western
Branch. Who being able & open-hearted, is about building a new
Meeting-house at her own expence. My affectionate desire for her
 is that she may be preserved, so as to retain a blameless character in
the important Station she stands. The 14th. was their Quar.ly Meeting for business here: dull and exer-
cising 
 cising: I had close labour with Men and Women, perceiving barren-
 ness among them: I hope it had some good effect on some of the youth
& others, but I leave it. That Evening had a meeting for the
black people in a School-house near the Widow Scotts ': It was the first
of this kind that was ever held in these parts, being large; One of the Jus-
tices attended, & some other Masters of Negroes. It was a solid favoured time
and these spake well of the Meeting: some of them said they should be very
free their Negroes should be at such meetings, and were glad they had
been there themselves, uniting with what was spoken, and wishing it
might be observed. 15th. We next travelled from hence to Bennets
 Creek, near the sea shore; and the next day had a large and favour'd
Meeting there; Also the same afternoon another at the Widow
Bufkins, likewise large for the place, as well as solid and satisfactory.
Some of the people seemed rejoiced, not having much opportunity to be
at friends Meetings. We parted with them very lovingly. 17th. Our next Meeting was at the South Branch, a very exercising
Season: I thought the desire of some was, that smooth things, or peace
might be spoken to them, believing they were too much in a whole
State, & that there was but little room for labour. --- But how
can there be peace, where Pride and Oppression abound; The slaves
having to bear the burden; many of them sorely oppressed, with
want of proper Clothing, Food &c, under Taskmasters, whose religion seems
to be in talking; The Land Barren or nearly worn out, and their
manner of Cultivation and Management but poor: So that the 
 Prospect of Things here looks gloomy every Way. It is a trying
 circumstance to me, to See the naked Bodies of slaves and cold wea-
ther near, Whilst the Sons of their Oppressors, in an idle life, ap-
pear so different; and their haughty daughters with stretched forth
necks and wanton looks, their long-tailed gowns, trailing, as tho'
some of them might spare something to put on the naked bodies of
those who wait upon them. 18th. We next had a small meeting near the great bridge at Robert
Pool's to Satisfaction: After which I had solid Conversation with some
gay women respecting their manner of dress, at a house where we
were kindly entertained; my Freedom with them seemed to be well ta-
 ken: They appeared somewhat religious, but I thought they wanted depth.
 they were not acquainted with friends, nor our principles. One thing
I mention'd for them to consider was, Whether some of the Stuff in their
Gown tails, & the price of superfluous ribbonds, might not well be
spared to put something on the naked bodies of little blacks, &c. It was a
solid season, and not resented, though I suppose they never heard such sentiments
 before; We parted very friendly; and rode in the Evening about 15 Miles,
and had a solid time with E.D. who said he was born at Egg-harbor in
Jersey. 22d We had a large and solid meeting at the Widow Britts ', in Cam-
den County, N. Carolina, a place where never had been held one of our
 Meetings, and but few of the people who ever had attended at one. The next day also we had a large and favoured meeting in the same
County, at the widow Richardson 's; These seemed a kind people, much
unacquainted with our way, and many hearts were tendered: I believe it was
a time not to be forgotten by some. 24th At Piney-Woods, we attended Friends preparative meeting: Here I had close
Labour, things appearing in a low state: I endeavored to stir them up to a
more lively Zeal for the cause and Testimony of truth; which they ap-
peared to receive well. On the next day was the Select Meeting at
the same place, for their Quarterly Meeting. My concern was to stir
 up to the pure part on the right education of Children and Families,
that becoming plainness might be kept to, and they be good examples
themselves, in their houses, furniture &c. --- The day follow-
ing was held their Qu.ly Meeting for business: Here, I believe the State of
my friends in a religious sense was poor, but little life & power: I lab-
oured both amongst Men and women in my small ability, for their help,
and I hope it ended to some profit at last: tho' a trying time. 27th I went from hence to Little-River, being a second time: and was at Meeting
there on first day, which I believe ended well. And in the after-
noon had a Meeting in the Court-house of Pasquotank County; at
which were many people, of black and White; It was a season of 
general 
 general satisfaction. Many in great tenderness signified their U-
 nity with me & my service; and some sincerely craved for my staying
 that night in their town: but I was easiest to leave them, as in the
hand of the Lord. 28th Had a meeting at the Old-neck, somewhat small, yet favour'd and
still. 30th Leaving Piney-Woods, we travelled to Rich-Square, and
the next day, had a large Meeting there, which to me was very exercising. 12th mo. 1st. On the day following at the request of some of the Baptists,
we had a Meeting in their Meeting-house; which was satisfactory, &
I believe ended well; being larger than I expected, in wet weather, and the
notice given being but small. 3rd Next, we were at a Monthly Meeting
at Jack's Swamp; rgIt was but small: some solid friends dwell here:
who seem rather in a weak State, and are in need of help: I laboured
among them according to measure, & they expressed unity with my Service. 4th We tarried at their first day meeting which was large, and mercifully
favoured: then went forward to Hallifax; The day following riding near
50 Miles towards a town called Rawleigh, the day after that we came
to it, Where the General Assembly for North-Carolina were sitting;
 & we found some friends at the place, desiring to endeavor for an alte-
 ration the cruel Laws relative to the Negroes. Having felt my mind much
 concerned on the subject, I was willing to join my endeavours to theirs. 7th. We attended the House of Common Council, had many private
Conferrences with Members, who received us friendly, yet seemed mostly op-
posed to the freedom of black People. I was endow'd by my Great Master with an innocent boldness, in which
I could use great freedom in solid conversation with the most leading men; for
they mostly quartered where we did; which gave me a full opportunity to re-
lieve my oppressed mind. 8th. The prospect seems gloomy, whether any
thing can be done at this time for the Relief of our distressed fellow Men,
yet I would not have my friends here be discouraged: The Cause is Surely
good; And I have no doubt but way will be made for this poor people's libe-
ration, but what way, or how Soon must be left to the Lord. My mind was
turned to think of trying for a religious public Meeting in the place
which some of those we conversed with, spake in favour of, if the Way
should be opened, and the Business they were met on, would admit of it: It was
also thought the house where they sat in would be the most suitable place; But after wait-
ing a while to see how matters would turn with respect to a publick
opportunity, it seemed scarce likely to be obtain'd in the present Circumstances.
I was therefore the more free to make use of private opportunities
with the Members of the Legislature and others; which was to my own
satisfaction & to theirs, as far as I saw: There being here now a
large collection of those of the first rank, Gentlemen, so called: most of
them being Men in some Office, Civil or military. I thought the res-
pect they shewed me was marvellous: For my simple Appearance, singular
as it was, some of them confessed it was instructive to them; that their own Conduct
and way of living was luxurious, & they allow'd much might be spared; Saying that
 I looked as well s they did, altho' they had great variety of roasted, baked,
& boiled provisions &c; whilst mine was about half a pint of milk and 
as 
 as much water, morning, noon and night without any flesh; Boarding at one house, we
generally sat at one Table. Some at first looked at me with astonishment,
and tho' they had never seen the like, said they believed, or did not know,
but it was the right way of living, but it would be hard for them to sub-
mit to. -- As they had private Rooms, a number of them invited
me (as it was at a tavern we were, & near 50 boarders all men of Note.) that if at
anytime I was weary of noise & craved to me more retired, I might freely
come into their rooms, & sit with them; & that they should be pleased if I
would make so free. All this seemed to be in my favour to furnish
me, when my mind was so engaged, with opportunities to touch on their
cruel Laws, the hardships & inhuman cruelties to which the poor blacks
were Subjected in that Government &c. I queried of them Why Things should
be in such a severe Way here, more than in any other Place that I had
heard of: For I had been thro' each of the Governments Eastward, as well as Mary-
 land and Virginia lately, and had not heard of any Cruelty of the kind
sanction'd by any other Legislative Body on the Continent: Some of them
spake of other States not having so many Slaves in them, and less occasion for
fear of their rising &c; my answer to that was, Those who so cruelly oppress
the Slaves, have more occasion to fear their rising, &c: My treating with them
on the subject was in a way of plain dealing, and so well received that
many of them kindly invited me to come and see them, if I should come near
their dwellings, for that it would give them pleasure (as they said) to entertain
 me: It was unexpected also to my Companion & myself, when he came
to Settle for our Tavern Expences whilst there, the Man would take
no pay for my Boarding, he was so well pleased with the visit. 1796. 12th. mo. 9th
 This morning we proposed to leave Rawlegh. My companion had bought
him a new horse, who was rather wild, & threw him after he mounted,
at which I was concern'd fearing he was hurt; & could not proceed with me,
but through favour we found he was not so much hurt as we had expected
and we travelled near forty Miles that day; & the two days following
so much as to make near 150 to Core sound. The 13th, we met with the
Ministers & Elders of that Monthly Meeting, to confer on the Subject of
visiting their families, which was united with, and two friends agreed to
join me in the service; which we proceeded in, and in less than four days
visited about 14 families, mostly to good satisfaction, besides attending
their Meeting at Coresound, (which is near the Sea-Coast). 17th. We had af
ter that a comfortable & satisfactory Meeting there, amongst our friends
by themselves; in which we were favoured with a measure of the
 Divine Presence owning us together. Here is a hopeful number of
youth of both Sexes; and their appearance more in the Simplicity
as to their Dress & otherwise: their apparel (I mean the Womens) was
mostly Homespun, no black silk Cloaks nor Bonnets among them, I was
comforted in their Company & parted with them in near love and fel-
lowship; after which visited two other Families, & went on to my friend
Horton Howards , whose Wife lay ill with the Consumption; I perceived her
to be innocent, laying in a quiet frame of mind, as nearly fit to leave
the World. 